District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0689.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
16 act may be cited as the "Closing of a Portion of a Public Alley in Square 785, S.O. 21-03369, Act
17 of 2025".
18 Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 404 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
19 December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 787; D.C. Official Code§ 1-204.04), and consistent with the Street
20 and Alley Closing Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-
21 201; D.C. Official Code§ 9-202.01 et seq.), the Council finds that the portion of the public alley
22 system in Square 785 shown on the Surveyor's plat filed under S.O. 21-03369 is unnecessary for
23 alley purposes and orders it closed, with title to the land to vest as shown on the Surveyor's plat.
24 The approval of the Council for the alley closing is contingent upon the satisfaction of all the
25 conditions set forth in the official S.O. file.
26 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
27 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement prepared by the Chief Financial Officer as
28 the fiscal impact statement required by section 602( c) (3) of the District of Columbia Home Rule
29 Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02 (c)(3)).
30 Sec. 4. Effective date.
1

31 This act shall take effect upon its approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
32 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
33 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
34 24, 1973 (87 Stat 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
35 Columbia Register.
2

ttdcra
GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
DEPARTMENT OF CONSUMER AND REGULATORY AFFAffiS
PERMIT OPERA TIO NS DIVISION
OFFICE OF THE SURVEYOR
1104 4TH STREET, s.w., 3 RD FLOOR
WASHINGTON, DC 20024
Surveyor's Office File No. - 21 - -03 - 36 - 9 2/19/2021
Date
APPLICATION TO CLOSE/DEDICATE A STREET OR ALLEY OR ELIMINATION OF
BUILDING RESTRICTION LINE
Location
Street(s)
Name: ___________________
Abutting Squares: ___________________
Portion to be closed/dedicated: ___________________
AS PER SKETCH A TTA CHED
Alley(s)
Name: Walking Alley behind 310 A Street NE
Abutting Squares: Square 0844 Lots 0844. 0028 and 0027. 0029. and 0030
Portion to be closed/dedicated.: light green and light blue portion of attached sketch -area behind lot 0028
AS PER SKETCH ATTACHED
This application is made by:
Donna McLean 202-299-4992
Applicant's Name (print) Telephone Number
308 A Street NE, Washington, D.C. 20002
Address
1 certify that the above information is true to tbe best ofmy knowledge.
TO REPORT WASTE, FRAUD OR ABUSE BY ANY DC GOVERNMENT OFFICE OR OFFICIAL,
CALL THE INSPECTOR GENERAL AT l-800-521-1639
Revised: l/23/2018

21-03369

March9, 2021
Mr. Joseph E.Snider
Surveyor, Office oftheSurveyor
DepartmentofConsumerand RegulatoryAffairs
11004" Street, SW
Washington, D.C. 20024
Re: Square0785 Walking AlleyClosure
DearMr.Snider:
On behalfofthe ownersof308 and 310AStreet NE, enclosed please find thecompleted
application forthe partial closingof a walking alleyin Square 0785. The application requeststhe
walking alley property bedivided asshown inthe attached map between the ownersof308AStreet NE
{Lott844, Square0785 which is owned by Donna McLean and Marcus Peacock) and theowners of310A
Street NE (Lot28, Square0785 which isownedby Joseph Hansen and Susan Hansen.)
The walkingalleyclosurewill provideadditional outdoorspace to the owners of308and 310A
Street NE and will eventually be absorbed intotheir residential property. The portionofthe wal
alley to be closed is unimproved, too narrow fora vehicle and unnecessary foralleypurposes. The
proposedclosingwill not disruptthe public alleysystem and will not interfere with alley access forany
other homes in Square0785. All owners ofthe abutting properties agree with the proposaland have
signedthe application.
Please begin the processingofthe above referencedapplication. Ifyou haveanyquestions,
please do not hesitatetocall me at(202) 299-4992. Thankyouforthe promptattentiontothis matter.
Sincerely,
boMe
Donna McLean
Co-owner, 308AStreet, NE

Description oftheApplication to close the
Walking Alley property behind310A Street N. E. Washington, D.C.
The request is toclose the WalkingAlley behind 310 A Street N.E. Washington, D.C. (Lot28,
Square 0785) and forthepropertyto be divided intotwotaxable lots and eventually revertedtothe
ownersof308 A Street, N.E. (Lot844, Square0785) and 310 A Street N.E. Ifthe WalkingAlley
property isclosed andrevertedtothe ownersof308 and 310Astreet, thegoal would betoabsorb the
property into theresidential property lots of308 and310 A Street,N.E.
The attached map shows thedivision ofthe Walking Alley:
* 308 A Street N.E. isowned by Marcus Peacock and Donna McLeanand ishighlighted in
green and the Walking Alleyproperty being requested forclosure and reversion isin light
green;
* 310A Street,N.E. ishighlighted in blueand the WalkingAlley property being requested for
closure and reversion is in lightblue.
The abuttingproperty ownersagreewith the proposal and theirsignaturesare included inthe
request.

3
N
I
V
PS
T
E
a
N
I
S
V
Z
T
E
£
2
3
0
1
Frederick Douglass Court
p
a “ o m u e u a g o n u q m y i p y y y q a A ‘Z 8 Z 9 ‘ 1 S E T -j e s s 1 7 9 sm u a p ] 0 o J “
7 2 0 6 1 Sg o n 8 q A d e u a io , n u ‘ O M U a 1 s e u p s p v
$820auenbs
(anjq)
8730150siaUME
aue
(9918)ppg307
pue
BupyeM2u3405Buy
Bumnge
Auadoud
Aaliy
syaUMO
“sanuadoud4184)
‘au404Sumy
azegz107Jo
pueaniq1481)
ul Aadosd
‘24310}ppB107Jo
S1aUMO
“uaau8yy8})
ulAuadoud
B ‘ 6 u 2
p|‘ y 8 j 2 e mP A ‘ L p N Oz aP‘ d e y s M O I I 9 7 3 “ v ,a0y
7A7 ,) p , 2 4 A a l i S i n g u e O .ye€
u
: y
a
x
© e
N ;S
1
0
v }
o
o P I
u n V
T
z
0
z
q
a
4
S
t
:
u
o
i
s
i
a
n

21-03369

PURSUANT TO D.C. LAW , EFFECTIVE
THE ALLEY SHOWN THUS: 777777 |S CLOSED AND TITLE VESTS
AS SHOWN UPON RECORDATION OF THIS PLAT.
OFFICE OF THE SURVEYOR, D.C.
,20__
| CERTIFY THAT THIS PLAT IS CORRECT AND IS RECORDED.
SURVEYOR, D.C.
SURVEYOR'S OFFICE, D.C.
Madefor: DONNA R. McLEAN
Drawn by: L.E.S. Checked by: a ws
Record and computations by: _B. M
Recorded at:
Recorded in Book Page SR-21-03369
Scale: 1 inch= 20feet
2021/ALLEYCLOSING/SR-21-03369-SQ.785
.E.N
,TEERTS
dr3
PUBLIC ALLEY CLOSED
SQUARE 785
PUBLIC
DETAIL
REVERTS TO
LOT 844
29
$45°00'00"E A STREET, N.E.
$45°00'00"E
PUBLIC
REVERTS TO
LOT 28
(NOT TO SCALE)

OWNERSHIP STATUS STATEMENT
Re:
A portion of Public Alley in Square 785 – S.O. 21-03369
The portion of Public Alley was recorded among the records of the Office of the
Surveyor in Subdivision Book 16 on Page 10, recorded on July 23, 1888.
Conclusion:
Title to the lots could not be determined to be held by the District of Columbia or the
United States.
May 20, 2024
_____________________
Joseph E. Snider
Surveyor, D.C.

DC Office of Tax and Revenue
MyTax DC

Home
Property Details
SSL : 0785- -0028  Make a
Payment
Premise Address : 310 A ST NE WASHINGTON DC
Balance :
20002
Details Assessment Tax Information Features Map A
Details Sales Information
Use Code : 024 - Instrument Number : 87342
Residential-
Sale Date : 07-Aug-
Conversion
2009
(Less Than
5 Units) Sale Price :
Neighborhood : 009 - Sales Code : Buyer =
Capitol Hill Seller
Sub-Neighborhood : C Sales Type : Improved
Ward : 6
Appraiser : Simeon
Williams
Mailing Address : 6309
WISCASSET
RD
BETHESDA
MD 20816-
2111


Owners Help
NNaammee
JOSEPH HANSEN TRUSTEE
SUSAN HANSEN TRUSTEE


DC Office of Tax and Revenue
MyTax DC

Home
Property Details
SSL : 0785- -0029  Make a
Payment
Premise Address : 1 FREDERICK DOUGLASS CT NE
Balance :
WASHINGTON DC 20002
Details Assessment Tax Information Features Map A
Details Sales Information
Use Code : 014 - Instrument Number : 48854
Residential-
Sale Date : 15-May-
Garage
2018
Neighborhood : 009 -
Sale Price : $600,000.00
Capitol Hill
Sales Code : Multi-
Sub-Neighborhood : C
Market Sale
Ward : 6
Sales Type : Improved
Appraiser : Simeon
Williams
Mailing Address : 314 A
STREET NE
WASHINGTO
DC 20002
Owners Help
NNaammee 

Name
DOUGLASS COURT PARTNERS LLC


DC Office of Tax and Revenue
MyTax DC

Home
Property Details
SSL : 0785- -0030  Make a
Payment
Premise Address : A ST NE WASHINGTON DC 20002
Balance :
Details Assessment Tax Information Features Map A
Details Sales Information
Use Code : 014 - Instrument Number : 48854
Residential-
Sale Date : 15-May-
Garage
2018
Neighborhood : 009 -
Sale Price : $600,000.00
Capitol Hill
Sales Code : Multi-
Sub-Neighborhood : C
Market Sale
Ward : 6
Sales Type : Improved
Appraiser : Simeon
Williams
Mailing Address : 314 A
STREET NE
WASHINGTO
DC 20002
Owners Help
NNaammee


Name
DOUGLASS COURT PARTNERS LLC


DC Office of Tax and Revenue
MyTax DC

Home
Property Details
SSL : 0785- -0844  Make a
Payment
Premise Address : 308 A ST NE WASHINGTON DC
Balance :
20002-5938
Details Assessment Tax Information Features Map A
Details Sales Information
Use Code : 011 - Instrument Number : 043923
Residential-
Sale Date : 27-Jun-
Single
1997
Family
(Row) Sale Price :
Neighborhood : 009 - Sales Code :
Capitol Hill
Sales Type :
Sub-Neighborhood : C
Ward : 6
Appraiser : Simeon
Williams
Mailing Address : 308 A ST
NE
WASHINGTO
DC 20002-
5938

H l

Help
Owners
NNaammee
MCLEAN DONNA
PEACOCK, MARCUS


s
1
9 U
M Q
u
o
n
e
U
H
o
j
u
l
s
a
f
e
s
,
s
u e
r e a
s
u e i
9 0
s
r
up
u
e
ax
e
n7
0
2
n9
9
1
y0
3
0

tenemkyaPa»
M
>
71.7
j
sliateD
ytreporP
noitamrofnI
selaS
s
l
i
a
t
e
D
srenwO

s19UN
u
o
n
e
u
n
o
y
u
y
s
a
j
e
s
,
s
y
e i
o
g
s
e
t
e
w6
o9
m'
e l 1 0 6
g'
s
os
m
e
n
&
o
u
e
e
e
syeiag
Auodorg

L? j
23 .
i
i
3
a
E
2
&
a
, =: i 2,
2 8 & 6?
~é&

s
1
0
U
M
Q
,
u
o
n
e
u
n
o
j
u
l
s
a
j
e
s
s
y
e
i
2
g
wa
us
o'
u i h e g e 0 z s
e
o
n
e
n
<
s
o
u
e
y
e
a
s
y
e
i
a
g
A
u
i
a
d
o
r
g

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
DEPARTMENT OF CONSUMER AND REGULATORY AFFAIRS
OFFICE OF THE SURVEYOR
File No: S.O. 21-03369 Date: April 29, 2021
To: Department of Transportation
Attention: Anna Chamberlin
To: Water and Sewer Authority
Attention: Kevin Harney
To: Office of Planning
Attention: Joel Lawson
To: Historic Preservation
Attention: Andrew Lewis – Historic Preservation Officer
To: Department of Housing and Community Development
Attention: Paul Walker, Architect
To: Fire Department
Attention: Chief Tony Falwell or Chief Spencer Hann
===============================================================
The attached application and plat(s) are being submitted for comments on the closing of a
portion of a public alley in Square 785. Please provide the Office of the Surveyor with
any objections or concerns you may have regarding the affect this application may have
on your operation within 30-days from the date of this request. If you have any questions
please contact Diana Dorsey Hill, Program Specialist at (202) 718-8166 or email her at
diana.dorsey.dc.gov.
________________________________
Joseph E. Snider, DC Surveyor
______________________________________________________________________________________
1100 4th Street, SW 3rd Floor Washington, D.C. 20024

Government of the District of Columbia
Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs
Permit Operations Division
Office of the Surveyor
April 29, 2021
Marcel C. Acosta, AICP, Executive Director
National Capital Planning Commission
th
401 9 Street, N.W., Suite 500
Washington, D.C. 20576
Re: S.O. 21-03369
Enclosed is the application and a print of the plat for the closing of a portion of a
public alley in Square 785.
This is being forwarded to the Council of the District of Columbia for legislative
action. The proposed alley closing is being processed in accordance with Section
9-202.01 of the D.C. Official Code. Pursuant to Section 9-202.02 of the D.C. Official
Code, the application is hereby referred to you for the recommendation of the
National Capital Planning Commission.
When you have furnished your recommendation to the Council, I would appreciate
your also sending a copy to the Office of the Surveyor.
Sincerely,
Joseph E. Snider
DC Surveyor
Enclosures

Government of the District of Columbia
Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs
Permit Operations Division
Office of the Surveyor
File No. S.O. 21-03369 Date: April 29, 2021
TO: Christine Healey, Commissioner
Advisory Neighborhood Commission 6C01
Sent via email to: 6C01@anc.gov
SUBJECT: Closing of a Portion of a Public Alley in Square 785 – S.O.21-03369
This is referred to the Advisory Neighborhood Commission (ANC) for review
pursuant to § 9-202.02(5) of the District of Columbia Official Code. Please feel free
to contact the applicant directly for further information related to the planned use of
the proposal.
Please provide your comments within 30-days from the date of this letter. If you
w ish to contact the Office of the Surveyor, please call Diana Dorsey Hill, Program
Specialist at (202) 718-8166 or at diana.dorsey@dc.gov.
If the Commission wishes to comment on the proposal, please send comments via email
to diana.dorsey@dc.gov.
The comments of the ANC will be forwarded to the Council of the District of
Columbia. If more time is needed to review this proposal, please inform the
Surveyor’s Office so we can make note of the time extension in the file.
Sincerely,
Joseph E. Snider
D.C. Surveyor
Attachments

Government of the District of Columbia
Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs
Permit Operations Division
Office of the Surveyor
April 29, 2021
MEMORANDUM
TO:
See Distribution
FROM:
Joseph E. Snider
DC Surveyor
SUBJECT:
Closing of a Portion of a Public Alley in Square 785 – S.O. 21-03396
The attached application and plat(s) are being forwarded for comments on the closing of
a portion of a public alley in Square 785.
Your company may have existing facilities that may be affected by this proposal. Please
notify this office as to what action you plan to take to relocate or rearrange your facility.
Please provide the Office of the Surveyor with any objections or concerns you may have
regarding this closing within 30-day from the date of this notice. If you have any
questions feel free to contact Diana Dorsey Hill, Program Specialist for the Office of the
Surveyor at (202) 718-8166.
Distribution:
PEPCO Verizon
Robert C. Brown or Boushra Sollman Kenneth D. Young
st
3400 Benning Road, NE 13101Columbia Pike FDC1, 1
Building No. 59 Silver Spring, Maryland 20705
Washington, D.C. 20019
Washington Gas Co.
Attn: Mr. Robert Banks
6801 Industrial Road
Springfield, Virginia 22151

Government of the District of Columbia
Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs
Permit Operations Division
Office of the Surveyor
April 29, 2021
MEMORANDUM
TO:
Anthony Duckett
Associate Administrator, SACD
Solid Waste Management Administration
FROM:
Joseph E. Snider
DC Surveyor
SUBJECT: Closing of a Portion of a Public Alley in Square 785 –
S.O. 21-03369
The attached application and plat(s) are being forwarded for comments on the
proposed closing of a portion of a public alley in Square 785.
Please provide the Office of the Surveyor with any objections or concerns you may
have regarding the affect this closing may have on your operation. Please provide
your comments within 30-days of the date of this notice.
If you have any questions or concerns, please contact Diana Dorsey Hill, Program
Specialist for the Office of the Surveyor at diana.dorsey@dc.gov or (202) 718-8166.
Attachments

Government of the District of Columbia
Department of Transportation
d. Planning and Sustainability Division
MEMORANDUM
TO: Joseph Snider
DC Surveyor
Office of the Surveyor
FROM: Anna Chamberlin, AICP
Associate Director
DATE: June 15, 2021
SUBJECT: S.O. No. 21-03369 – Alley Closure in Square 785
The District Department of Transportation (DDOT) has reviewed the submitted materials for the proposed alley
closure. This memorandum provides DDOT’s assessment of the proposal.
OVERVIEW
Donna McLean (“the Applicant”) seeks approval to remove a 257-square foot walking alley segment (7 feet x 27
feet and 8 feet x 85 feet) within an existing public alley system. The subject alley is located in Square 0785
adjacent to Lots 844 and 28 (Property) owned by the Applicant and the neighbor at 308 A Street NE. The
walking alley proposed to close is part of a larger alley network connecting A Street NE, Frederick Douglass Court
NE, and Constitution Avenue NE. The alley is located west of part of the alley network, south of garages, west of
Frederick Douglass Court NE, and east of existing townhomes. It is DDOT’s practice to anticipate possible future
uses of the right-of-way during the review of closure requests. Given the walking alley is surrounded by existing,
built alley connections, DDOT does not find this portion of the alley is necessary for trash collection or vehicle
access to the adjacent or surrounding lots.
OPERATIONS
The proposed alley closure is located in the rear of lots 844 and 28 and abuts lots 29 and 30, as shown in Figure
2. Lot 844 is owned by the owner of 308 A Street NE and Lot 38 is owned by 310 A Street NE. The surrounding
public alley network will maintain connectivity and is not negatively impacted with the closure. Currently, the
alley segment is paved, but inaccessible to vehicles due to the narrow width. Trash collection is located off of
Frederick Douglas Court to the east of the proposed closure and will not change with the closure.
District Department of Transportation | 250 M Street SE, Washington, DC 20003 | 202.673.6813 | ddot.dc.gov

S.O. No. 21-03369 – Alley Closure in Square 785
Figure 1. Proposed Alley Closure
DDOT aims to provide a safe and efficient roadway network that provides for the timely movement of people,
goods and services. This includes short blocks, transportation connections, and a healthy tree canopy. DDOT has
reviewed the site plan and does not find a future connection likely given the area has existing, easier navigable
access points within the existing alley network.
DDOT ASSETS
DDOT requires the Applicant to compensate the District for the removal of existing DDOT assets in the area of
the proposed alley closure. DDOT’s Streetlight Division reviewed the submitted materials and has noted that
there is an underground electrical conduit powering alley pole number 65012, a pole and light that is outside of
the proposed alley closure, in the proposed alley closure area, as shown in Figure 2. If approved, the Applicant
will be required to relocate the conduits to alternative feed points within public space. The Applicant will need
to apply for a public space permit, compensate DDOT for any lost conduit, and complete the relocation prior to
closing the alley.
3

S.O. No. 21-03369 – Alley Closure in Square 785
Figure 2. DDOT Assets in Existing Alley
RECOMMENDATION
DDOT objects to the proposed alley closure until the following condition is satisfied:
 The Applicant will coordinate with DDOT and Pepco and relocate DDOT assets, at the Applicant’s
expense, prior to the alley closure and compensate the District for any lost conduit.
AC:eb
3

Government of the District of Columbia
Department of Transportation
d. Planning and Sustainability Division
MEMORANDUM
TO: Joseph Snider
DC Surveyor
Office of the Surveyor
FROM: Anna Chamberlin
Associate Director
DATE: April 30, 2024
SUBJECT: DDOT Supplemental Report – S.O. No. 21‐03369
Alley Closure in Square 785
This memorandum is intended to supplement the District Department of Transportation’s (DDOT) report
submitted to the Office of the Surveyor on July 29, 2021.
In that report, DDOT objected to recordation of the closure plat for the subject alley within Square 785
until the Applicant coordinated with DDOT and Pepco and paid for the relocation of DDOT assets into
DDOT right‐of‐way.
In accordance with the condition requested in DDOT’s July 29, 2021 report, DDOT confirms there is no
longer a current or foreseeable future transportation need for this portion of land. The DDOT electrical
conduit has been relocated from the alley area to be closed to an alternate location within public space.
As such, DDOT supports the recordation of the closure plat for this land.
AC:nh
District Department of Transportation | 250 M Street SE, Washington, DC 20003 | 202.673.6813 | ddot.dc.gov

MEMORANDUM
TO: Joseph E. Snider, RLS, D.C. Surveyor
Office of the Surveyor
JL for
FROM: Jennifer Steingasser, Deputy Director, Development Review & Historic Preservation
DATE: June 25, 2021
SUBJECT: S.O. 21-03369
Proposed Closing of a Public Alley in Square 785
I. RECOMMENDATION
The Office of Planning (OP) has completed its review of the application for the requested alley closing,
and has no objection to this request.
OP notes that the District Department of Transportation (DDOT) has advised OP that they have
requested that the Applicant coordinate with DDOT and Pepco to relocate DDOT assets, at the
Applicant’s expense, prior to the alley closure and compensate the District for any lost conduit.
II. SITE DESCRIPTION
Address 310 A Street, NE, rear
Applicant Donna McLean
Legal Description Square 785, Lots 844, 27, 28, 29, and 30
Ward / ANC 6 / 6C
Zone RF-3 – provides for areas adjacent to the U.S. Capitol precinct
predominantly developed with attached houses on small lots
within which no more than 2 dwelling units are permitted.
Historic District Capitol Hill Historic District
Comprehensive Plan Land Use Map – Moderate Density Residential
Generalized Future Land Use Policy Map – Neighborhood Conservation Area
and Policy Map Designation
The proposal is not inconsistent with this designation.
Comprehensive Plan The proposal would be not inconsistent with various objectives of
the Comprehensive Plan, including ones in the Land Use and
Transportation Citywide Elements and Capitol Hill Area Element
of the Comprehensive Plan.
1100 4th Street SW, Suite E650, Washington, D.C. 20024 phone 202-442-7600, fax 202-535-2497
www.planning.dc.gov Find us on Facebook or follow us on Twitter @OPinDC

OP Report on Alley Closing Request, S.O. 21-03369, Square 785
June 25, 2021 Page 2 of 5
III. PROPOSAL
Plat of Proposed Alley Closing
Request: To close a portion of an alley adjacent to Lots 844, 26, 27, 28, 29,
and 30 in Square 785, as shown in the map above.
Description: The request is to close a portion of the walking alley located in
Square 785 and revert the area to the adjoining property owners
(105 square feet to the owner of Lot 844 at 308 A Street NE and
152 to the owner of Lot 28 at 310 A Street NE). The walking
alley is currently paved, is L shaped and connects two wider
sections of alley within the square.
Size: The portion of the alley to be closed is 257 square feet in area with
a maximum width of 8 feet and a minimum width of 7 feet.

OP Report on Alley Closing Request, S.O. 21-03369, Square 785
June 25, 2021 Page 3 of 5
Adjacent Ownership: Lot 844 – Marcus Peacock
Lot 26 – Susan Hansen Trustee
Lot 27 – Ronald Wyden
Lot 28 – Steven Harkabus
Lot 29 – Douglass Court Partners LLC
Lot 30 – Douglass Court Partners LLC
Proposed Development: The portion of the walking alley to be closed would be reverted to
adjoining property owners and which are currently in residential
use.
IV. ANALYSIS
A. Planning and Urban Design
The Director of the Office of Planning is required to “determine whether the proposed closing is in
compliance with the District’s planning and urban design objectives”, as per 24 DCMR 1401.2(c).
These objectives, as contained within the Comprehensive Plan (10DCMR, Chapter 9), include:
§300 Land Use Element
§ 306.11 Development Around Metrorail Stations
Concentrate redevelopment efforts on those Metrorail station areas which offer the greatest
opportunities for infill development and growth, particularly stations in areas with weak market
demand, or with large amounts of vacant or poorly utilized land in the vicinity of the station
entrance.
Not applicable.
§310.8 Policy LU-2.2.7: Alley Closings
Discourage the conversion of alleys to private yards or developable land when the alleys are
part of the historic fabric of the neighborhood and would otherwise continue to perform their
intended functions, such as access to rear garages and service areas for trash collection.
The proposal to close the walking alley and revert the property to the adjoining residences at 308 and
310 A Street NE would not result in the loss of intended function for garage access or as a service area
for trash collection. The alley is a walking alley that varies in width from 7 to 8 feet and is not of
sufficient width to provide for vehicular access or for service access for trash collection. The closure of
the walking alley would not impact Frederick Douglass Court. The Historic Preservation Office (HP)
has indicated no objection to the proposal, so it would not negatively impact the historic fabric of the
Capitol Hill neighborhood.
§900 Urban Design Element
The critical urban design issues facing the District of Columbia…include:
• Strengthening civic identify through a renewed focus on assets such as public spaces,
boulevards, and waterfront areas…
• Improving the public realm, particularly street and sidewalk space…

OP Report on Alley Closing Request, S.O. 21-03369, Square 785
June 25, 2021 Page 4 of 5
The walking alley is not sufficiently wide to accommodate vehicular or service vehicle traffic and would
not be adjacent to a public street. The requested closure would result in additional private open space
for the properties at 308 and 310 A Street NE.
§903.7 Policy UD 1.1.2: Reinforcing the L’Enfant and McMillan Plans.
…Restore as appropriate and where possible, previously closed streets and alleys, and
obstructed vistas or viewsheds. (See Figure 9.3: Discouraging Alley and Street Closings within
the L’Enfant Plan Area 903.10)
Not applicable. The proposed closure of the walking alley would not impact a historic L’Enfant Street.
§913.6 Policy UD-3.1.9: Street Closures
Strongly discourage the closure of streets for private ownership or use. Any request for street
closure should be reviewed in terms of the resulting impacts on vehicular and pedestrian
circulation, access to private property, emergency access and fire protection, view obstruction,
loss of open space, building scale, and other factors.
Not applicable. The Applicant is proposing to close a portion of a walking alley that would not result in
impacts to pedestrian or vehicular circulation, access to private property, emergency access and fire
protection, view obstruction, loss of open space, or building scale.
The major impacts from a land use and physical character aspect would be as follows:
• The proposed closure of the walking alley would result in a slight increase to the land area of the
adjoining residential properties at Lot 844 or 308 A Street NE (105 square feet) and Lot 28 or
310 A Street NE (152 square feet).
• The adjoining properties are in the RF-3 zone, which is a Residential Flat zone intended for
properties containing no more than two (2) dwelling units.
§ 1700 Capitol Hill Area Element
Policy CH-1.1.7: Alleys Protect Capitol Hill’s system of historic alleys and develop plans for the use of
large block interior spaces where appropriate. These plans should be developed in coordination with the
affected Advisory Neighborhood Commissions, residents, and community groups.
1508.8
The Applicant is proposing to close a portion of a walking alley that does not serve as vehicular or
service access. The proposed closing of a portion of the walking alley would not impact the adjoining
alley network that consist of Frederick Douglass Court. HP has indicated no objection to this proposal.
B. Housing Linkage
No Housing Linkage required as the adjacent properties are all zoned for low density rowhouse or flat
residential development.
C. 24 DCMR Chapter 14 Requirements
The street or alley closing regulations require submission of a plan so that reviewing agencies can
determine the potential impact of the requested closing. 24 DCMR §1400.8 requires the plan to cover
items including:
(f) The approximate gross floor areas intended for various uses such as retail, office, residential,
industrial, and commercial;

OP Report on Alley Closing Request, S.O. 21-03369, Square 785
June 25, 2021 Page 5 of 5
Not provided. The alley closing would result in land area being reverted to adjoining property owners
for open space or yard.
(g) The points of ingress and egress that vehicles will use for parking or loading purposes;
(h) The location of off-street parking spaces and their number and size;
(i) The location and size of loading and unloading facilities such as berths, docks, and platforms;
(j) A Tracking diagram for the maximum size trucks intended to use the loading and unloading
facilities;
Not provided. The alley closing request is for a walking alley that does not provide for vehicular access.
(k) Elevation views for each side of any building proposed for the site.
Not provided, no building is currently proposed for the area of the proposed alley closing.
V. CONCLUSIONS
The information provided by the applicant is adequate to meet the requirements of Section 1400.8, for a
project at this stage of its design development, subject to DDOT and DPW concurrence.
JS/emv

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
MEMORANDUM
TO: Roland F. Dreist, Jr.
Surveyor of the District of Columbia
FROM: Paul Walker
Architect (Construction Inspector)
DATE: May 5.2021
SUBJECT: Department of Housing and Community Development Review comments on
Alley closing on Square 0785
File No: S.O. 21-03369
The Department of Housing and Community Development (DHCD) has reviewed the
above referenced alley behind 310 A Street N.E. Washington, D.C. (Lot 28, Square 0785) .
The request is to close the Walking Alley behind 310 A Street N.E. Washington, D.C. (Lot 28,
Square 0785) and for the property to be divided into two taxable lots and eventually reverted to
the owners of 308 A Street, N .E. (Lot 844, Square 0785) and 310 A Street N .E. Closing the
walking Alley property to be closed and reverted to the owners of 308 and 310 A street, the
goal would be to absorb the property into the residential property lots of 308 and 310 A
Street, N.E. DHCD supports the requested action specified in the application. This alley
closing has no effects on our DHCD operation. DHCD support is bases upon the
understanding of the information contained in the application.
Paul Walker, Architect DFD
Department of Housing and Community Development | 1800 Martin Luther King, Jr. Avenue, SE, Washington, DC 20020 | 202.442.7200 | dhcd.dc.gov

MEMORANDUM
TO: Joseph Snider, Office of the Surveyor
SUBJECT: Proposed Partial Alley Closure Square 785 (S.O. 21-03369)
DATE: May 10, 2021
Thank you for contacting the DC Historic Preservation Office regarding the above-referenced
sidewalk easement dedication. We appreciate the opportunity to review this action. However, § 9-
202.02(4) of the D.C. Code only requires the Mayor to refer applications “to close any street located
on the L’Enfant Street Plan” to the Historic Preservation Review Board. We have no comment on
this proposed action since it involves the closure of an alley rather than a street.
BY: _______________________________
C. Andrew Lewis
Senior Historic Preservation Specialist
DC State Historic Preservation Office
21-0501
1100 4th Street, S.W., Suite E650, Washington, D.C. 20024 Phone: 202-442-7600 Fax: 202-442-7638

okee
oes Government of the District of Columbia
DC Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department
Muriel Bowser JohnA. Donnelly,Sr
Mayor Fireand EMSChief
FIRE PREVENTION DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Joseph E. Snider
Officeofthe Surveyor
FROM: Spencer A. Hamm,
DCFEMS /Fire Marshal’s Office
DATE: May 5, 2021
RE: Surveyor’sOffice File 21-03369 (Square 0785 / Lot 844, 27, 28, 29, and 30)
Thiswrittencorrespondence is being forwardedtoyour officeto address the alley closingassociatedwith
Surveyor’s OfficeFilenumber21-03369 that was submittedto DCFEMS OfficeoftheFireMarshal for
review.
Based on our review DCFEMS Officeofthe FireMarshalhas no objectiontothis alley closurerequest.
However, theapplicant isto ensurethat allfiredepartment access andservice feature requirements are in
accordance with DCMR 12-H Fire Code Supplement, 2017 edition, and the International Fire Code, 2015
edition.
Ifyouhaveany questions orconcerns,pleasedonothesitateto contact my office at (202) 727-1614.
pAeear
Sincerely,
Spence A. Hamm
BFC/Assistant FireMarshal
DCFEMS-FireMarshal'sOffice
secon,
oe,
FrankD. ReevesMunicipalCenter 7 phone (202)673-3320
2000 4hSteetNM,uteS00 % Bese (202)a02-0807
Washington, Be20008 4 é weoete fomedeaor
"nt

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
Department of Public Works
Solid Waste Management Administration
MEMORANDUM
To: Tamara Bell, Program Support Specialist Department
of Buildings
From: Steven Thompson Jr,
Associate Administrator DPW, SWMA
Subject: Closing of a portion of a Public Alley in Square 785- S.O. 21-03369
Date: Tuesday, February 23, 2026
The following, closing of a portion of a Public Alley in Square, 785-S.O. 21 – 03369, has been investigated
again on Tuesday, February 23, 2026.
The Department has reviewed the request to close a portion of Public Alley in Square, located at 785-S.O.
– 21 – 03369. At this time, the department has no concerns about the closure of this alley. It will not have
any impact on the residential collection in this area. However, we strongly recommend that all property
owners be notified not to place their trash and recycling containers in the alley on non-collection days to
avoid enforcement action.
This project will not cause a negative environmental impact if project developers and owners are
following applicable laws and regulations governing solid waste management during all phases of the
project.
District laws require that the property and the abutting public space be maintained daily
free of litter, dust management, and debris and that all solid waste be properly
containerized and removed at sufficient frequency by a licensed solid waste Collector.
CONTACT DPW
If you have any questions regarding this determination, you can contact Steven Thompson by email at
steven.thompson@dc.gov or by telephone at (202) 645-7190.
Steven Thompson
Associate Administrator
Solid Waste Education and Enforcement Program (SWEEP)
District Department of Public Works

(cid:0)(cid:2)(cid:3)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:5)(cid:6)
(cid:7)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:10)(cid:7)(cid:8)(cid:11)(cid:12)(cid:8)(cid:13)(cid:14)(cid:10)(cid:15)(cid:16)(cid:17)(cid:10)(cid:12)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:14)(cid:8)(cid:19)(cid:10)(cid:21)(cid:16)(cid:22)(cid:22)(cid:8)(cid:23)(cid:14)(cid:13)(cid:10)(cid:24)(cid:10)(cid:25)(cid:26)(cid:27)(cid:26)(cid:10)(cid:28)(cid:29)(cid:24)(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:31) !
"(cid:17)(cid:16)(cid:22)#(cid:5)$$%(cid:10)&’(cid:4)(%$(cid:10))*+,*(cid:5)$$%+%-’(cid:5)+.
/(cid:20)(cid:14)(cid:8)&(cid:5)$(cid:10)012313430(cid:10)5652(cid:10)7&
8(cid:16) #(cid:5)9:(;<(cid:10)#=%$%(cid:10)>#(cid:0)?@(cid:10))*=%$%-*(cid:5)9:(;,*’-A(cid:5)B.C(cid:10)D(cid:5)$*9(cid:5)<(cid:10)&%E=+=(cid:4)=%$(cid:10)>(cid:0)FG@(cid:10))&%E=+=(cid:4)=%$-D(cid:5)$*9(cid:5),*’-A(cid:5)B.
(cid:21)H I%J9%*(cid:5)9<(cid:10)K%+(cid:5)$(cid:10)>#(cid:0)?@(cid:10))9%+(cid:5)$-(cid:4)%J9%*(cid:5)9,*’-A(cid:5)B.C(cid:10)79=’(<(cid:10)&=%(cid:10)>#(cid:0)?@(cid:10))+=%-L9=’(3,*’-A(cid:5)B.
MNOPQRST(cid:10)UVWX(cid:10)YZ[W\(cid:10)]^W_W‘[aYb(cid:10)c^]Z(cid:10)]daXWbY(cid:10)]c(cid:10)aVY(cid:10)ef(cid:10)g]hY^‘ZY‘ai(cid:10)e](cid:10)‘]a(cid:10)j\Wjk(cid:10)]‘(cid:10)\W‘kX(cid:10)]^(cid:10)]lY‘(cid:10)[m[jVZY‘aX(cid:10)d‘\YXX(cid:10)n]d
^Yj]_‘WoY(cid:10)aVY(cid:10)XY‘bY^(cid:10)[‘b(cid:10)k‘]p(cid:10)aV[a(cid:10)aVY(cid:10)j]‘aY‘a(cid:10)WX(cid:10)X[cYi(cid:10)qc(cid:10)n]d(cid:10)rY\WYhY(cid:10)aV[a(cid:10)aVWX(cid:10)YZ[W\(cid:10)WX(cid:10)XdXlWjW]dXs(cid:10)l\Y[XY(cid:10)c]^p[^b(cid:10)a]
lVWXVW‘_tbji_]h(cid:10)c]^(cid:10)[bbWu]‘[\(cid:10)[‘[\nXWX(cid:10)rn(cid:10)vfUv(cid:10)wYjd^Wan(cid:10)vlY^[u]‘X(cid:10)fY‘aY^(cid:10)xwvfyi
z{|}~(cid:10)(cid:127)(cid:128)(cid:129)(cid:10)(cid:130)(cid:131)(cid:131)(cid:132)(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:133)(cid:129)(cid:134)(cid:135)(cid:10)(cid:135)(cid:128)(cid:10)|(cid:136)(cid:136)(cid:10)|(cid:10)(cid:137)(cid:138)(cid:135)(cid:135)(cid:137)(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:139)(cid:128)}(cid:135)(cid:131)(cid:140)(cid:135)(cid:141)(cid:10)(cid:142)(cid:10)(cid:139)|(cid:137)(cid:137)(cid:131)(cid:136)(cid:10)(cid:134)(cid:128)(cid:137)(cid:138)(cid:136)(cid:10)(cid:143)|(cid:134)(cid:135)(cid:131)(cid:10)|(cid:144)(cid:135)(cid:131)(cid:145)(cid:10)(cid:135){(cid:131)(cid:127)(cid:10)(cid:134)(cid:131)}(cid:135)(cid:10)(cid:135){(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:137)(cid:131)(cid:135)(cid:135)(cid:131)(cid:145)(cid:10)|}(cid:136)
(cid:135){(cid:131)(cid:127)(cid:10)(cid:134)|(cid:138)(cid:136)(cid:10)(cid:135){|(cid:135)(cid:10)(cid:135){(cid:131)(cid:138)(cid:145)(cid:10)(cid:135)(cid:145)(cid:129)(cid:139)~(cid:134)(cid:10)(cid:136)(cid:145)(cid:138)(cid:146)(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:136)(cid:128)(cid:143)}(cid:10)(cid:135){(cid:138)(cid:134)(cid:10)(cid:147)|(cid:135){(cid:132)(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:142)(cid:10)(cid:139)(cid:128)(cid:145)(cid:145)(cid:131)(cid:139)(cid:135)(cid:131)(cid:136)(cid:10){(cid:138)(cid:148)(cid:10)|}(cid:136)(cid:10)(cid:134)|(cid:138)(cid:136)(cid:10)(cid:135){|(cid:135)(cid:10)(cid:138)(cid:135)(cid:10)(cid:143)|(cid:134)(cid:10)(cid:138)(cid:148)(cid:147)(cid:128)(cid:134)(cid:134)(cid:138)(cid:149)(cid:137)(cid:131)
(cid:144)(cid:128)(cid:145)(cid:10)|}(cid:127)(cid:10)(cid:135)(cid:145)(cid:129)(cid:139)~(cid:10)(cid:128)(cid:145)(cid:10)(cid:139)|(cid:145)(cid:10)(cid:135)(cid:128)(cid:10)(cid:136)(cid:145)(cid:138)(cid:146)(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:136)(cid:128)(cid:143)}(cid:10)(cid:135){(cid:138)(cid:134)(cid:10)(cid:150)(cid:10)(cid:144)(cid:128)(cid:128)(cid:135)(cid:10)(cid:143)(cid:138)(cid:136)(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:147)|(cid:135){(cid:10)|}(cid:136)(cid:10)(cid:147)(cid:145)(cid:128)(cid:146)(cid:138)(cid:136)(cid:131)(cid:136)(cid:10){(cid:138)(cid:148)(cid:10)(cid:143)(cid:138)(cid:135){(cid:10)(cid:147){(cid:128)(cid:135)(cid:128)(cid:134)(cid:132)(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:142)(cid:10)(cid:135)|(cid:137)~(cid:131)(cid:136)(cid:10)(cid:135)(cid:128)
{(cid:138)(cid:148)(cid:10)|(cid:151)|(cid:138)}(cid:10)|}(cid:136)(cid:10){(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:134)|(cid:138)(cid:136)(cid:10)(cid:135){|(cid:135)(cid:10)(cid:138)(cid:135)(cid:10)(cid:136)(cid:138)(cid:136)}(cid:152)(cid:135)(cid:10)(cid:148)|(cid:135)(cid:135)(cid:131)(cid:145)(cid:10)(cid:134)(cid:138)}(cid:139)(cid:131)(cid:10){(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:135){(cid:128)(cid:129)(cid:151){(cid:135)(cid:10)(cid:135){(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:153)(cid:145)(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:136)(cid:131)(cid:147)|(cid:145)(cid:135)(cid:148)(cid:131)}(cid:135)(cid:10)(cid:143)(cid:128)(cid:129)(cid:137)(cid:136)(cid:10)(cid:128)(cid:147)(cid:147)(cid:128)(cid:134)(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:138)(cid:135)
(cid:149)(cid:131)(cid:139)|(cid:129)(cid:134)(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:135){(cid:131)(cid:127)(cid:10)(cid:143)(cid:128)(cid:129)(cid:137)(cid:136)(cid:10)}(cid:131)(cid:131)(cid:136)(cid:10)(cid:135)(cid:128)(cid:10)(cid:136)(cid:145)(cid:138)(cid:146)(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:136)(cid:128)(cid:143)}(cid:10)(cid:135){(cid:131)(cid:145)(cid:131)(cid:132)(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:142)(cid:10)(cid:135)(cid:128)(cid:137)(cid:136)(cid:10)(cid:135){(cid:131)(cid:148)(cid:10)(cid:135){(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:153)(cid:145)(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:136)(cid:131)(cid:147)|(cid:145)(cid:135)(cid:148)(cid:131)}(cid:135)(cid:10){|(cid:136)(cid:10)|(cid:137)(cid:145)(cid:131)|(cid:136)(cid:127)
|(cid:147)(cid:147)(cid:145)(cid:128)(cid:146)(cid:131)(cid:136)(cid:10)(cid:138)(cid:135)(cid:10)(cid:149)(cid:131)(cid:139)|(cid:129)(cid:134)(cid:131)(cid:10)}(cid:128)(cid:10)(cid:153)(cid:145)(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:135)(cid:145)(cid:129)(cid:139)~(cid:10)(cid:139)(cid:128)(cid:129)(cid:137)(cid:136)(cid:10)(cid:153)(cid:135)(cid:10)(cid:135){(cid:145)(cid:128)(cid:129)(cid:151){(cid:10)|(cid:10)(cid:150)(cid:10)(cid:144)(cid:128)(cid:128)(cid:135)(cid:10)(cid:143)|(cid:137)~(cid:138)}(cid:151)(cid:10)|(cid:137)(cid:137)(cid:131)(cid:127)(cid:10)(cid:154)(cid:155)(cid:130)(cid:10)(cid:143)(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:143)(cid:128)(cid:129)(cid:137)(cid:136)(cid:10)(cid:145)(cid:131)(cid:135)|(cid:138)}(cid:10)|(cid:137)(cid:137)
{(cid:128)(cid:148)(cid:131)(cid:134)(cid:10)(cid:136)(cid:138)(cid:145)(cid:131)(cid:139)(cid:135)(cid:10)|(cid:139)(cid:139)(cid:131)(cid:134)(cid:134)(cid:10)(cid:135)(cid:128)(cid:10)(cid:135){(cid:131)(cid:10)|(cid:137)(cid:137)(cid:131)(cid:127)(cid:10)(cid:156)}(cid:128)(cid:10)(cid:131)|(cid:134)(cid:131)(cid:148)(cid:131)}(cid:135)(cid:134)(cid:10)}(cid:131)(cid:131)(cid:136)(cid:131)(cid:136)(cid:157)(cid:141)(cid:10)|}(cid:136)(cid:10)(cid:135){(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:158)(cid:128)(cid:137)(cid:138)(cid:136)(cid:10)(cid:159)|(cid:134)(cid:135)(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:145)(cid:131)(cid:147)(cid:145)(cid:131)(cid:134)(cid:131)}(cid:135)|(cid:135)(cid:138)(cid:146)(cid:131)
(cid:135)(cid:128)(cid:137)(cid:136)(cid:10)(cid:148)(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:135)(cid:128)(cid:10)(cid:134)(cid:135)(cid:128)(cid:147)(cid:10)(cid:139)|(cid:137)(cid:137)(cid:138)}(cid:151)(cid:10){(cid:138)(cid:148)(cid:10)|}(cid:136)(cid:10){(cid:131)(cid:10)(cid:136)(cid:138)(cid:136)}(cid:152)(cid:135)(cid:10)(cid:143)|}(cid:135)(cid:10)(cid:135)(cid:128)(cid:10)(cid:136)(cid:138)(cid:134)(cid:139)(cid:129)(cid:134)(cid:134)(cid:10)(cid:138)(cid:135)(cid:10)(cid:144)(cid:129)(cid:145)(cid:135){(cid:131)(cid:145)(cid:132)(cid:10)(cid:10)
z{|}~(cid:10)(cid:127)(cid:128)(cid:129)(cid:10)(cid:160)(cid:10)(cid:130)(cid:128)}}|
¡¢£⁄¥(cid:10)#(cid:5)9:(;<(cid:10)#=%$%(cid:10)>#(cid:0)?@(cid:10))*=%$%-*(cid:5)9:(;,*’-A(cid:5)B.
ƒ§¤'¥(cid:10)&(cid:5)$*%;<(cid:10)&%;(cid:10)23<(cid:10)3430(cid:10)“63064“(cid:10)F&
«£¥(cid:10)D(cid:5)$*9(cid:5)<(cid:10)&%E=+=(cid:4)=%$(cid:10)>(cid:0)FG@(cid:10))&%E=+=(cid:4)=%$-D(cid:5)$*9(cid:5),*’-A(cid:5)B.
‹›¥(cid:10)I%J9%*(cid:5)9<(cid:10)K%+(cid:5)$(cid:10)>#(cid:0)?@(cid:10))9%+(cid:5)$-(cid:4)%J9%*(cid:5)9,*’-A(cid:5)B.C(cid:10)79=’(<(cid:10)&=%(cid:10)>#(cid:0)?@(cid:10))+=%-L9=’(3,*’-A(cid:5)B.C(cid:10)#(cid:5)$$%
&’(cid:4)(%$(cid:10))*+,*(cid:5)$$%+%-’(cid:5)+.
ƒfifl(cid:176)§›'¥(cid:10)–†6(cid:10)K(‡(cid:2)(:(cid:3)(cid:10)·(cid:5)9(cid:10)(cid:2)L*%(cid:3)(*(cid:10)(cid:181)(cid:5)++($(cid:3):(cid:10)¶(cid:10)•-(cid:0)-(cid:10)32¶455“‚
„”»…(cid:10)‰(cid:190)¿»(cid:192)(cid:10)`´»ˆ»˜¿¯‰˘(cid:10)˙´`(cid:190)(cid:10)`¨¯…»˘‰(cid:10)`˙(cid:10)¯”‰(cid:10)`´ˆ¿˜»(cid:201)¿¯»`˜˚
¸(cid:204)(cid:10)˝˛ˇ—
(cid:10)
(cid:222)(cid:220)
(cid:209)(cid:210)(cid:211)˛(cid:212)(cid:211)(cid:10)(cid:212)(cid:211)(cid:211)(cid:10)(cid:213)(cid:214)(cid:211)(cid:10)(cid:211)(cid:215)˛(cid:204)(cid:210)(cid:10)(cid:216)(cid:211)(cid:210)(cid:217)(cid:218)(cid:10)(cid:213)(cid:217)(cid:10)(cid:219)(cid:217)(cid:210)(cid:204)(cid:220)(cid:10)(cid:221)˛(cid:212)(cid:213)(cid:211)(cid:10)(cid:222)(cid:211)(cid:223)(cid:224)(cid:211)(cid:212)(cid:213)(cid:204)Æ(cid:226)(cid:10)(cid:224)ª(cid:220)˛(cid:213)(cid:211)(cid:220)(cid:10)(cid:228)(cid:217)(cid:215)(cid:215)(cid:211)Æ(cid:213)(cid:212)(cid:10)(cid:229)(cid:217)(cid:222)(cid:10)(cid:213)(cid:214)(cid:211)(cid:10)˛(cid:210)(cid:210)(cid:211)(cid:230)(cid:10)(cid:228)(cid:210)(cid:217)(cid:212)(cid:204)Æ(cid:226)(cid:231)
(cid:219)ŁØŁ(cid:10)Œº(cid:236)(cid:237)(cid:238)(cid:238)(cid:239)(cid:240)Ł(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:221)(cid:211)(cid:10)(cid:212)(cid:213)(cid:204)(cid:210)(cid:210)(cid:10)(cid:214)˛æ(cid:211)(cid:10)Æ(cid:217)(cid:213)(cid:10)(cid:222)(cid:211)(cid:228)(cid:211)(cid:204)æ(cid:211)(cid:220)(cid:10)(cid:224)ª(cid:220)˛(cid:213)(cid:211)(cid:220)(cid:10)(cid:228)(cid:217)(cid:215)(cid:215)(cid:211)Æ(cid:213)(cid:212)(cid:10)(cid:213)(cid:217)(cid:10)(cid:213)(cid:214)(cid:211)(cid:204)(cid:222)(cid:10)(cid:215)(cid:211)(cid:215)(cid:217)(cid:10)(cid:220)˛(cid:213)(cid:211)(cid:220)(cid:10)˝˛(cid:230)(cid:10)(cid:238) (cid:231)
Œ(cid:237)ŒºŁ(cid:10)(cid:242)(cid:228)(cid:217)ª(cid:230)(cid:10)˛(cid:213)(cid:213)˛(cid:228)(cid:214)(cid:211)(cid:220)(cid:243)(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:244)(cid:217)(cid:224)(cid:210)(cid:220)(cid:10)(cid:230)(cid:217)(cid:224)(cid:10)ª(cid:210)(cid:211)˛(cid:212)(cid:211)(cid:10)(cid:229)(cid:217)(cid:222)(cid:218)˛(cid:222)(cid:220)(cid:10)(cid:213)(cid:214)(cid:204)(cid:212)(cid:10)(cid:213)(cid:217)(cid:10)Ø(cid:209)ı(cid:246)(cid:247)(cid:244)(cid:217)(cid:224)Æ(cid:228)(cid:204)(cid:210)(cid:10)(cid:212)(cid:217)(cid:10)(cid:213)(cid:214)˛(cid:213)(cid:10)˛(cid:10)(cid:214)(cid:211)˛(cid:222)(cid:204)Æ(cid:226)(cid:10)(cid:228)˛Æ(cid:10)(cid:216)(cid:211)
(cid:212)(cid:228)(cid:214)(cid:211)(cid:220)(cid:224)(cid:210)(cid:211)(cid:220)ł(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:10)ø(cid:214)(cid:211)(cid:10)˛ªª(cid:210)(cid:204)(cid:228)˛Æ(cid:213)(cid:10)(cid:204)(cid:212)(cid:10)(cid:222)(cid:211)(cid:223)(cid:224)(cid:211)(cid:212)(cid:213)(cid:204)Æ(cid:226)(cid:10)(cid:213)(cid:214)˛(cid:213)(cid:10)(cid:213)(cid:214)(cid:211)(cid:10)ª˛(cid:228)(cid:0)˛(cid:226)(cid:211)(cid:10)(cid:216)(cid:211)(cid:10)(cid:229)(cid:217)(cid:222)(cid:218)˛(cid:222)(cid:220)(cid:211)(cid:220)(cid:10)(cid:218)(cid:204)(cid:213)(cid:214)(cid:217)(cid:224)(cid:213)(cid:10)(cid:213)(cid:214)(cid:211)(cid:204)(cid:222)
(cid:228)(cid:217)(cid:215)(cid:215)(cid:211)Æ(cid:213)(cid:212)Ł(cid:10)(cid:10)¸˛æ(cid:211)(cid:10)˛(cid:10)(cid:218)(cid:217)Æ(cid:220)(cid:211)(cid:222)(cid:229)(cid:224)(cid:210)(cid:10)(cid:220)˛(cid:230)Ł
(cid:10)
(cid:2)(cid:211)(cid:212)(cid:213)(cid:10)(cid:222)(cid:211)(cid:226)˛(cid:222)(cid:220)(cid:212)(cid:231)
(cid:10)
(cid:3)(cid:211)(cid:211)

(cid:0)
(cid:2)(cid:3)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:4)(cid:0)(cid:2)(cid:6)(cid:0)(cid:2)(cid:7)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:10)(cid:11)(cid:12)(cid:0)(cid:13)(cid:8)(cid:7)(cid:14)(cid:8)(cid:4)(cid:15)(cid:0)(cid:16)(cid:17)(cid:10)(cid:18)(cid:3)(cid:4)(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:9)(cid:20)
(cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:22)(cid:3)(cid:18)(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:7)(cid:22)(cid:0)(cid:20)(cid:23)(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:16)(cid:24)(cid:8)(cid:25)(cid:10)(cid:11)(cid:7)(cid:8)
(cid:2)(cid:10)(cid:17)(cid:4)(cid:8)(cid:20)(cid:15)(cid:10)(cid:5)(cid:20)(cid:0)(cid:7)(cid:22)(cid:0)(cid:26)(cid:24)(cid:3)(cid:19)(cid:27)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:14)(cid:9)
(cid:28)(cid:29)(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:30) (cid:28)!"#$%&(cid:28)’ (!)
(cid:0)
(cid:0)
*+,-.(cid:0)/012345(cid:0)/6787(cid:0)9/:;<
=>?@.(cid:0)ABC12D745(cid:0)E74(cid:0)F5(cid:0)GHGI(cid:0)FJHG(cid:0)KE
L,.(cid:0)E745(cid:0)M3N687OD(cid:0)9/KP<(cid:0)QM3N687ODRE74GSDTRN0UV
WX.(cid:0)Y7Z17D015(cid:0)M7[08(cid:0)9/:;<(cid:0)Q17[08RO7Z17D01SDTRN0UV\(cid:0)K16T35(cid:0)E67(cid:0)9/:;<(cid:0)Q[67R]16T3GSDTRN0UV\(cid:0)/0887(cid:0)ETO378
QD[SD0887[7RT0[V
=^_‘>X@.(cid:0)M3aC32b(cid:0)c01(cid:0)C]D7b3D(cid:0)d0[[38b2(cid:0)e(cid:0)fR:R(cid:0)GFeHgghi
(cid:0)
j(cid:20)(cid:20)(cid:4)(cid:18)(cid:23)(cid:10)(cid:27)(cid:0)(cid:4)(cid:8)(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:17)(cid:8)(cid:10)(cid:25)(cid:3)(cid:7)(cid:24)(cid:9)(cid:19)(cid:11)(cid:0)(cid:8)(cid:10)(cid:18)(cid:10)(cid:3)(cid:25)(cid:10)(cid:27)(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:7)(cid:15)(cid:15)(cid:10)(cid:5)(cid:20)(cid:9)(cid:0)(cid:27)(cid:4)(cid:20)(cid:10)(cid:27)(cid:0)k(cid:4)(cid:11)(cid:0)l(cid:12)(cid:0)mnmo(cid:6)(cid:8)(cid:10)(cid:14)(cid:4)(cid:8)(cid:27)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:14)(cid:0)(cid:20)(cid:23)(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:7)(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:14)(cid:0)(cid:7)(cid:22)(cid:0)(cid:4)
(cid:17)(cid:7)(cid:8)(cid:20)(cid:3)(cid:7)(cid:5)(cid:0)(cid:7)(cid:22)(cid:0)(cid:4)(cid:0)(cid:17)(cid:24)p(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:4)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:10)(cid:11)(cid:0)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:0)(cid:16)q(cid:24)(cid:4)(cid:8)(cid:10)(cid:0)rst(cid:6)(cid:0)(cid:0)u(cid:23)(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:4)(cid:17)(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:18)(cid:4)(cid:20)(cid:3)(cid:7)(cid:5)(cid:0)(cid:23)(cid:4)(cid:9)(cid:0)p(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:5)(cid:0)(cid:4)(cid:18)(cid:20)(cid:3)(cid:25)(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:18)(cid:10)(cid:0)mnmo(cid:0)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:27)(cid:0)(cid:3)(cid:9)
(cid:22)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:4)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:11)(cid:0)(cid:8)(cid:10)(cid:4)(cid:27)(cid:11)(cid:0)(cid:20)(cid:7)(cid:0)p(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:7)(cid:8)v(cid:4)(cid:8)(cid:27)(cid:10)(cid:27)(cid:0)(cid:20)(cid:7)(cid:0)(cid:23)(cid:4)(cid:25)(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:4)(cid:0)(cid:17)(cid:24)p(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:18)(cid:0)(cid:23)(cid:10)(cid:4)(cid:8)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:14)(cid:0)(cid:9)(cid:18)(cid:23)(cid:10)(cid:27)(cid:24)(cid:19)(cid:10)(cid:27)(cid:6)(cid:0)(cid:0)w(cid:7)v(cid:10)(cid:25)(cid:10)(cid:8)(cid:12)(cid:0)v(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:5)(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:27)(cid:0)(cid:20)(cid:7)(cid:0)(cid:23)(cid:4)(cid:25)(cid:10)
(cid:24)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:4)(cid:20)(cid:10)(cid:27)(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:7)(cid:15)(cid:15)(cid:10)(cid:5)(cid:20)(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:8)(cid:7)(cid:15)(cid:0)(cid:16)(cid:7)(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:27)(cid:0)x(cid:4)(cid:9)(cid:20)(cid:10)(cid:6)(cid:0)(cid:0)y(cid:20)(cid:0)v(cid:7)(cid:24)(cid:19)(cid:27)(cid:0)p(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:14)(cid:8)(cid:10)(cid:4)(cid:20)(cid:19)(cid:11)(cid:0)(cid:4)(cid:17)(cid:17)(cid:8)(cid:10)(cid:18)(cid:3)(cid:4)(cid:20)(cid:10)(cid:27)(cid:0)(cid:3)(cid:22)(cid:0)(cid:11)(cid:7)(cid:24)(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:7)(cid:24)(cid:19)(cid:27)(cid:0)(cid:24)(cid:17)(cid:27)(cid:4)(cid:20)(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:11)(cid:7)(cid:24)(cid:8)
(cid:18)(cid:7)(cid:15)(cid:15)(cid:10)(cid:5)(cid:20)(cid:9)(cid:0)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:27)(cid:0)(cid:17)(cid:8)(cid:7)(cid:25)(cid:3)(cid:27)(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:20)(cid:23)(cid:10)(cid:5)(cid:0)(cid:5)(cid:7)(cid:0)(cid:19)(cid:4)(cid:20)(cid:10)(cid:8)(cid:0)(cid:20)(cid:23)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:0)k(cid:4)(cid:11)(cid:0)t(cid:12)(cid:0)mnmt(cid:12)(cid:0)(cid:9)(cid:7)(cid:0)(cid:20)(cid:23)(cid:4)(cid:20)(cid:0)v(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:0)(cid:22)(cid:7)(cid:8)v(cid:4)(cid:8)(cid:27)(cid:0)(cid:20)(cid:23)(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:4)(cid:17)(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:18)(cid:4)(cid:20)(cid:3)(cid:7)(cid:5)
(cid:22)(cid:7)(cid:8)(cid:0)(cid:9)(cid:18)(cid:23)(cid:10)(cid:27)(cid:24)(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:0)
(cid:0)
y(cid:22)(cid:0)(cid:11)(cid:7)(cid:24)(cid:0)(cid:23)(cid:4)(cid:25)(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:11)(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:7)(cid:5)(cid:18)(cid:10)(cid:8)(cid:5)(cid:9)(cid:12)(cid:0)(cid:17)(cid:19)(cid:10)(cid:4)(cid:9)(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:27)(cid:7)(cid:0)(cid:5)(cid:7)(cid:20)(cid:0)(cid:23)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:3)(cid:20)(cid:4)(cid:20)(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:20)(cid:7)(cid:0)(cid:18)(cid:7)(cid:5)(cid:20)(cid:4)(cid:18)(cid:20)(cid:0)(cid:24)(cid:9)(cid:6)(cid:0)(cid:0)w(cid:4)(cid:25)(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:4)(cid:0)(cid:14)(cid:8)(cid:10)(cid:4)(cid:20)(cid:0)(cid:27)(cid:4)(cid:11)(cid:6)
(cid:0)
(cid:26)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:20)(cid:0)(cid:8)(cid:10)(cid:14)(cid:4)(cid:8)(cid:27)(cid:9)(cid:12)
(cid:0)
(cid:2)(cid:10)(cid:10)
(cid:0)
(cid:2)(cid:3)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:4)(cid:0)(cid:2)(cid:6)(cid:0)(cid:2)(cid:7)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:10)(cid:11)(cid:12)(cid:0)(cid:13)(cid:8)(cid:7)(cid:14)(cid:8)(cid:4)(cid:15)(cid:0)(cid:16)(cid:17)(cid:10)(cid:18)(cid:3)(cid:4)(cid:19)(cid:3)(cid:9)(cid:20)
(cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:22)(cid:3)(cid:18)(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:7)(cid:22)(cid:0)(cid:20)(cid:23)(cid:10)(cid:0)(cid:16)(cid:24)(cid:8)(cid:25)(cid:10)(cid:11)(cid:7)(cid:8)
(cid:2)(cid:10)(cid:17)(cid:4)(cid:8)(cid:20)(cid:15)(cid:10)(cid:5)(cid:20)(cid:0)(cid:7)(cid:22)(cid:0)(cid:26)(cid:24)(cid:3)(cid:19)(cid:27)(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:14)(cid:9)
z(cid:29)(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:30) (cid:28)!"#$%&(cid:28)’ (!)
(cid:0)
(cid:0)

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
Department of Public Works
Solid Waste Management Administration
MEMORANDUM
TO: Joseph Snider.
Surveyor. D.C.
T.D.
FROM: Anthony Duckett
Assoc. Deputy Director of Projects
SUBJECT: Closing of a portion of a Public Alley in Square 785- S.O. 21-03369
Date: May 3rd, 2021
The following, closing of a portion of a Public Alley in Square, 785-S.O. 21 – 03369, has been
investigated.
The Department has reviewed the request for the closing of a portion of Public Alley in Square,
785-S.O. – 21 – 03369, at this time the department has concerns with this portion of the alley being
closed, it will have an impact on the residential collection in this area, we recommend strongly that
we do not close this portion of the alley. Attach are the trash route in this area.
If you have any questions, please call me at 202-359-5747.
1831 Fenwick St. NE Washington DC 20002 202-727-2539

Fe ee ee ooo © 000 oORMAItUtmIPANKEE00 00+
®
a
2
607_1 q 607_1
°
°
>
' é z
\ a °
° 8
3 3 °
k a . iS °
2 ° é °
a ° a °
° : 3
607_1 Faith Tabernacle60%_1
United Holy Church © ©
?
e AStNE ee @ @ @StNE

National
Capital
Planning
Commission 4019”StreeNtW. NorthLobby Suite500 WashingCt2o00n0,4 Tel202.482.7200 Fax202.482.7272 _www.ncpe.gov
‘CommissionMembers IN REPLY REFERTO:
NCPC FileNo. 8276
PresidentialAppointees
ElzabethA.White,Vice-Chair
June 7,2021
‘MoyorelAppointees Mr. Joseph Snider
[ArringtonDixon DistrictofColumbia DepartmentofConsumerand Regulatory Affairs
ndaArgo Office ofthe Surveyor
3199 8th Street, NE
Washington, DC20024
xOfficioMembers
SecretaryofDeferse
DearMr. Snider:
TheHonorydabAusltine
Pursuant to delegationsofauthority adopted by the Commission, I approvedthe commentsto
‘Secrofethteianterriyor
‘TheHonoDreabHbaalloend
the Councilof the District of Columbia forthe PartialClosing ofan Alleyin Square 785 -
‘ActingAdminiosfGtenreraalStenoicres
S.0. 21-03369located at 316 Frederick Douglass Court, NE, Washington, DC. Acopy ofthe
“TheHonorKaatbylKaele
Delegated Action ofthe ExecutiveDirectorisenclosed and availableonline at
(aleman
‘CommoinHtomteleaned Security www.nepe.gov/review/archive/2021/6/as partof the June2021 meeting materials.
‘RodGovernmefnats
UnitedStatesSenate
‘TheHonorGaarybCPleteers Implementationofthe project may requirereview by local agencies, including the issuance of
‘chaewoman permitspursuanttoregulations promulgated undertheauthority offederal environmental
‘CoomnOvmersiighttandtRefeorm
US.HouseofRepresentatives statutes,
‘TheHonoCarroyanB.bMalloneey
Sincerely,
Mayor
Disotfrcoikucmbta MefGA—
‘TheHonorableMurielBowser
(chalean
‘Counc theDistrictofColumbia
‘TheHonorablePhi Mendelson| Marcel Acosta
Executive Director
ExecutiveDirector
MarcelAcosta Enclosures
ce: Mr. Andrew Trueblood, Director, DCOfficeofPlanning
Mr. Frederick Lindstrom,Assistant Secretary, U.S. CommissionofFineArts

Capi Delegated Action of the Executive Director
Planning
‘{ Commission
PROJECT NCPC FILE NUMBER
Partial Closing of an Alley in Square 785 - 8276
8.0. 21-03369 NCPC MAPFILE NUMBER
316 Frederick Douglass Court, NE 4.13(44.40)45322
Washington, DC
ACTION TAKEN
‘SUBMITTED BY
i. 7 Approval of comments to the
aDnisdtrFiecetguofistoConluAmbtiaairDeepPaarrtimentit orof Coronsumer Council‘ of the Distritesct of ColumbiAa
Office ofthe Surveyor REVIEWAUTHORITY
Advisory
Per DC Code§ 9-202.02
The District ofColumbia Office ofthe Surveyor has submitted a proposal to close a portion ofan
alley in Square 785 which is located in northeast Washington, DC. The block is bounded by A
Street, NE, 3” Street, NE, 4" Street NE, and Constitution Avenue, NE and includes residential
uses. The portion ofthe alley to be closed is 261 square feet with a maximum width ofeight feet.
The portion ofthe alley to be closed is adjacent to Lots 28, 29, 30, and 844. The remainderofthe
alley will remain accessible. This alley is used for pedestrians given its narrow size. The are no
federal properties within Square 785 that would require use ofthe alley.
Stafffinds the project is consistent with relevant Comprehensive Plan policies contained in the
Historic Preservation and Federal Environment Elements. The alley closing will not impact any
federal properties, nor any other identified federal interes ts . NCPC has an advisory reviewofalley
closings, and thereforedoes not have a responsibility under theNational Historic Preservation Act
or theNational Environmental Policy Act.
The Coordinating Committee reviewed the proposal at its May 12, 2021 meeting. The Committee
forwarded theproposed the Commission withthe statement that theproposal was coordinated with
some, but not all, participating agencies. The District Department of Transportation received the
surveyor’s application and will review priorto preparing a formal agency opinion. The District of
Columbia Office ofPlanning indicated they have not finished theiranalysis but are working with
the applicant and are coordinating.

CommissionAction Page2
NCPC FileNo.8276
aaa
PUBLIC ALLEY CLOSED
iLL.
—— if- =n
i i G
ale - [o],
eS:
—
Pursuanttodelegationsof authority adopted bytheCommissionon April 1, 2021 andperDC Code
§ 9-202.02, I find thatthe proposed partial alley closure in Square 785 would notbe inconsistent
with the Comprehensive Plan for the National Capital nor would it adversely impact any other
identified federal interests.
Mirtle 5/z8/2)
Marcel Acosta
Executive Director

6801 Industrial Road
Springfield, Virginia 22151
May 05, 2021
Mr. Joseph E. Snider
Office of the Surveyor
1100 4th Street, S.W., Room E320
Washington, D.C. 20024
Re: Application to close Walking Alley Behind 310 A St. NE. Washington D.C. 20017 (Square 785,
Lot 844, 28, 27, 29 & 30)
Dr. Mr. Snider,
Our, consultant, EN Engineering, has reviewed the proposed public alley closures in the subject
location detailed in the attachments to the subject application filed by Donna Mclean. After reviewing the
area, it has been determined that Washington Gas does not have active natural gas facilities within the
limits of the proposed alley closure which will be impacted by this proposal. Attached is a map of
Washington Gas’ facilities in the area. Washington Gas approves the proposed alley closure at this
location.
Should you have any questions or concerns regarding these facilities, you may contact, Jalen
Triplett at:
EN Engineering (ENE)
811 Pinnacle Drive, Suite Q
Linthicum Heights, Maryland 21090
jtriplett@enengineering.com
(443) 407-7609 (Office)
(630) 353-7777 (Fax)
Sincerely,
Jonathan Honey
Washington Gas
System Replacement Engineer
JHoney@washgas.com
Office: 703-750-4732

© pepco”
[ANEXELONCOMPANY
Distribution Engineering
Distretof Columbia
3400 Benning Road, NE
Washington, DC 20019
October 14,2025
Mr.Joseph E. Snider
OC Surveyor
Governmentofthe District ofColumbia
Department ofConsumer and RegulatoryAffairs
1100 4"Street, SW
3" Floor
Washington, DC 20024
Dear Mr. Snider,
‘Subject: Proposed closingofa publicalley forSquare0785, Lots0844,0028, 0027,0029and 0030-
5.0.21-03369,
In response toyour memorandumconcerningthesubject proposedclosingofalleySquare0785, Lots
0844,0028, 0027,0029and 0030-S.0.21-03369, wecommentasfollows:
We have reviewed thedocumentsshowingthe proposedclosureofthe alleyforSquare 0785, Lots0844,
0028, 0027, 0029and0030-S.).21-0336,we have determined that Pepco’sfac il ities will not be affected
bythis proposed alleyclosure.
Ifthere areanyquestions about Pepco’sfacilities, please call (667)301-6269orcontact bye-mail:
jmccray@pepco.com
sincerely,
Jane McCray
Engineering Manager
Pepco Distribution Engineering
OC New Business

Distribution Engineering
pepco.com
District of Columbia
3400 Benning Road, NE
Washington, DC 20019
Fax: (202) 388-2721
July 14, 2021
Mr. Joseph E. Snider
DC Surveyor
Government of the District of Columbia
Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs
1100 4th Street, SW
3rd Floor
Washington, DC 20024
Dear Mr. Snider:
Subject: Proposed Dedication of a public alley for Square 0844 Lots 0844. 0028 and 0027. 0029.
and 0030– S.O. 21-03369
In response to your Memorandum concerning the subject proposed dedication of alley
Square 0844 Lots 0844. 0028 and 0027. 0029. and 0030– S.O. 21-03369, we comment as follows:
We have reviewed the documents showing the proposed dedication of the alley for Square
0844 Lots 0844. 0028 and 0027. 0029. and 0030– S.O. 21-03369, we have determined that Pepco’s
facilities will not be affected by this proposed street dedication.
If you have any question about Pepco’s facilities, please call me on (202) 428-1509 or
contact by e-mail at Tamrat.abegaz@exeloncorp.com.
Sincerely,
Tamrat Abegaz
Tamrat Abegaz
Engineer/Supervisor Designers
Distribution Engineering – DC

(cid:0)(cid:2)(cid:3)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:5)(cid:6)
(cid:7)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:10)(cid:11)(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:14)(cid:12)(cid:15)(cid:16)(cid:10)(cid:17)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:10)(cid:11)(cid:12)(cid:20)(cid:21)(cid:15)(cid:12)(cid:22)(cid:10)(cid:23)(cid:18)(cid:24)(cid:24)(cid:12)(cid:25)(cid:16)(cid:15)(cid:10)(cid:26)(cid:10)(cid:27)(cid:28)(cid:29)(cid:28)(cid:10)(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:26) !!"#
(cid:7)(cid:19)(cid:18)(cid:24)$(cid:5)%&’()(cid:10)$*+,+(cid:10)-$(cid:0)./(cid:10)01*+,+21(cid:5)%&’(31425(cid:5)67
89(cid:16)(cid:12):(cid:5),(cid:10);<=><>?>;(cid:10)@ABC(cid:10)D:
E(cid:18) F(cid:5),1%(cid:5))(cid:10):+G*H*(cid:4)*+,(cid:10)-(cid:0)DI/(cid:10)0:+G*H*(cid:4)*+,2F(cid:5),1%(cid:5)31425(cid:5)67
(cid:23)J K+L%+1(cid:5)%)(cid:10)M+H(cid:5),(cid:10)-$(cid:0)./(cid:10)0%+H(cid:5),2(cid:4)+L%+1(cid:5)%31425(cid:5)67N(cid:10)O%*4’)(cid:10):*+(cid:10)-$(cid:0)./(cid:10)0H*+2P%*4’>31425(cid:5)67
=(cid:10)+(cid:3)(cid:3)+4QH’,(cid:3)(cid:10)-=RR(cid:10)S./
>=T?BB@C(cid:10)T(cid:10)O’P4(cid:5)(cid:10)U(cid:5)HH’,(cid:3)&(cid:10)-(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:10)%’6*&’/2P1VN
WXXY(cid:10)ZX[\]\^(cid:10)_‘ab
(cid:10)
cde‘fe(cid:10)fee(cid:10)ghe(cid:10)eZ‘]d(cid:10)iedXj(cid:10)gX(cid:10)ckclm(cid:10)[enoefg]\^(cid:10)pX[[epg]X\f(cid:10)gX(cid:10)ghe][(cid:10)degge[(cid:10)Y‘geY(cid:10)qodr(cid:10)stu(cid:10)vwvsx
ypXzr(cid:10)‘gg‘pheY{(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:10)|e(cid:10)fg]dd(cid:10)h‘}e(cid:10)\Xg(cid:10)[epe]}eY(cid:10)ghe][(cid:10)pXZZe\gfx(cid:10)(cid:10)l‘\(cid:10)rXo(cid:10)zde‘fe(cid:10)~X[j‘[Y(cid:10)gh]f(cid:10)gX
mc(cid:127)(cid:128)(cid:129)lXo\p]d(cid:10)fX(cid:10)gh‘g(cid:10)‘(cid:10)he‘[]\^(cid:10)p‘\(cid:10)ie(cid:10)fpheYodeY(cid:130)(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:131)he(cid:10)‘zzd]p‘\g(cid:10)]f(cid:10)[enoefg]\^(cid:10)gh‘g(cid:10)ghe
z‘p(cid:132)‘^e(cid:10)ie(cid:10)~X[j‘[YeY(cid:10)j]ghXog(cid:10)ghe][(cid:10)pXZZe\gfx(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:133)‘}e(cid:10)‘(cid:10)jX\Ye[~od(cid:10)Y‘rx
(cid:10)
(cid:134)efg(cid:10)[e^‘[Yfu
(cid:10)
(cid:135)ee
(cid:10)
(cid:135)]‘\‘(cid:10)(cid:135)x(cid:10)(cid:135)X[feru(cid:10)c[X^[‘Z(cid:10)(cid:136)zep]‘d]fg
m~~]pe(cid:10)X~(cid:10)ghe(cid:10)(cid:136)o[}erX[
(cid:135)ez‘[gZe\g(cid:10)X~(cid:10)(cid:134)o]dY]\^f
(cid:137)(cid:138)(cid:139)(cid:140)(cid:139)(cid:141)(cid:137)(cid:142)(cid:143)(cid:144)(cid:145)(cid:146)(cid:147)(cid:137)(cid:148)(cid:141)(cid:149)(cid:142)(cid:150)
(cid:10)
(cid:10)
(cid:151)(cid:152)(cid:153)(cid:154)(cid:155)(cid:10)(cid:156)(cid:157)(cid:158)(cid:159)(cid:160)¡¢(cid:10)(cid:156)£⁄¥⁄(cid:10)ƒ(cid:156)§¤'
“«‹›(cid:155)(cid:10)fi(cid:160)fl¥(cid:160)(cid:159)fl⁄¡¢(cid:10)(cid:176)–(cid:158)£†(cid:10)‡·¢(cid:10)(cid:181)·(cid:181)¶(cid:10)•‚•„(cid:10)”»
…(cid:153)(cid:155)(cid:10)»‰(cid:190)(cid:158)⁄¡¢(cid:10)¿⁄¥(cid:160)‚ƒ”(cid:192)”(cid:190)§'(cid:10)`´ˆ‰‰(cid:158)⁄¡˜–(cid:160)–‰(cid:157)¯‰(cid:157)ˆ˘
˙¨(cid:155)(cid:10)(cid:201)⁄˚(cid:158)⁄fl(cid:157)(cid:158)¢(cid:10)¸⁄ˆ(cid:157)¥(cid:10)ƒ(cid:156)§¤'(cid:10)`(cid:158)⁄ˆ(cid:157)¥¯†⁄˚(cid:158)⁄fl(cid:157)(cid:158)˜fl‰¯(cid:204)(cid:157)˝˘˛(cid:10)”(cid:158)£‰(cid:160)¢(cid:10)»£⁄(cid:10)ƒ(cid:156)§¤'(cid:10)`ˆ£⁄¯–(cid:158)£‰(cid:160)(cid:181)˜fl‰¯(cid:204)(cid:157)˝˘˛(cid:10)(cid:156)(cid:157)¥¥⁄(cid:10)»‰†(cid:160)⁄¥
`flˆ˜fl(cid:157)¥¥⁄ˆ⁄¯‰(cid:157)ˆ˘
“ˇ—(cid:209)«¨›(cid:155)(cid:10)¸(cid:160)(cid:210)(cid:211)(cid:160)(cid:159)(cid:212)(cid:10)(cid:213)(cid:157)(cid:158)(cid:10)¸(cid:160)˝£(cid:159)(cid:160)fl(cid:10)(cid:190)(cid:157)ˆˆ(cid:160)¥(cid:212)(cid:159)(cid:10)(cid:214)(cid:10)(cid:215)¯§¯(cid:10)(cid:181)(cid:216)(cid:214)·‡‡(cid:217)(cid:218)
(cid:10)
WXXY(cid:10)(cid:128)~ge[\XX\(cid:10)q‘\eb
(cid:10)
(cid:128)gg‘pheY(cid:10)]f(cid:10)‘(cid:10)pXzr(cid:10)X~(cid:10)ghe(cid:10)z[e}]Xofdr(cid:10)foiZ]ggeY(cid:10)pXZZe\gf(cid:10)~[XZ(cid:10)ckclmx(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:131)he(cid:10)pXZZe\gf(cid:10)‘[e(cid:10)~X[
‘(cid:10)YeY]p‘g]X\(cid:10)]\(cid:10)(cid:136)no‘[e(cid:10)w(cid:219)ttx(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:131)he(cid:10)‘pgo‘d(cid:10)[enoefg(cid:10)]f(cid:10)~X[(cid:10)‘(cid:10)‘dder(cid:10)pdXf]\^(cid:10)]\(cid:10)(cid:136)no‘[e(cid:10)w(cid:220)(cid:219)(cid:221)x(cid:10)(cid:10)cde‘fe
z[X}]Ye(cid:10)of(cid:10)j]gh(cid:10)‘(cid:10)[e}]feY(cid:10)degge[(cid:10)]\Y]p‘g]\^(cid:10)‘\(cid:10)‘dder(cid:10)pdXf]\^(cid:10)]\(cid:10)(cid:136)no‘[e(cid:10)(cid:220)(cid:219)(cid:221)x(cid:10)(cid:128)dfX(cid:10)‘gg‘pheY(cid:10)‘[e
fozzX[g]\^(cid:10)YXpoZe\gfx(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:131)h]f(cid:10)‘zzd]p‘g]X\(cid:10)h‘f(cid:10)iee\(cid:10)‘pg]}e(cid:10)f]\pe(cid:10)vwvs(cid:10)‘\Y(cid:10)]f(cid:10)~]\‘ddr(cid:10)[e‘Yr(cid:10)gX(cid:10)ie
~X[j‘[YeY(cid:10)gX(cid:10)h‘}e(cid:10)‘(cid:10)zoid]p(cid:10)he‘[]\^(cid:10)fpheYodeYx(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:222)g(cid:10)jXodY(cid:10)ie(cid:10)‘zz[ep]‘geY(cid:10)]~(cid:10)rXo(cid:10)pXodY(cid:10)z[X}]Ye(cid:10)gh]f
]\~X[Z‘g]X\(cid:10)\X(cid:10)d‘ge[(cid:10)gh‘\(cid:10)_‘r(cid:10)(cid:221)u(cid:10)vwv(cid:221)x(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:222)~(cid:10)rXo(cid:10)h‘}e(cid:10)‘\r(cid:10)pX\pe[\fu(cid:10)zde‘fe(cid:10)YX(cid:10)\Xg(cid:10)hef]g‘ge(cid:10)gX
pX\g‘pg(cid:10)Ze(cid:10)X[(cid:10)(cid:223)‘ZX\(cid:10)mx(cid:10)(cid:127)‘i[‘YX[u(cid:10)(cid:135)ezogr(cid:10)(cid:135)l(cid:10)(cid:136)o[}erX[x(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:133)‘}e(cid:10)‘(cid:10)jX\Ye[~od(cid:10)e}e\]\^x
(cid:10)
(cid:134)efg(cid:10)[e^‘[Yfu
(cid:10)

(cid:0)(cid:2)(cid:2)
(cid:3)
(cid:0)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:5)(cid:3)(cid:0)(cid:7)(cid:3)(cid:0)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:10)(cid:2)(cid:11)(cid:12)(cid:3)(cid:13)(cid:9)(cid:8)(cid:14)(cid:9)(cid:5)(cid:15)(cid:3)(cid:16)(cid:17)(cid:2)(cid:18)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:19)(cid:4)(cid:10)(cid:20)
(cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:22)(cid:4)(cid:18)(cid:2)(cid:3)(cid:8)(cid:22)(cid:3)(cid:20)(cid:23)(cid:2)(cid:3)(cid:16)(cid:24)(cid:9)(cid:25)(cid:2)(cid:11)(cid:8)(cid:9)
(cid:0)(cid:2)(cid:17)(cid:5)(cid:9)(cid:20)(cid:15)(cid:2)(cid:6)(cid:20)(cid:3)(cid:8)(cid:22)(cid:3)(cid:26)(cid:24)(cid:4)(cid:19)(cid:27)(cid:4)(cid:6)(cid:14)(cid:10)
(cid:28)(cid:29)(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:30) (cid:28)!"#$%&(cid:28)’ (!)
(cid:3)
(cid:3)
(cid:3)
(cid:3)

(cid:0)(cid:2)(cid:3)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:5)(cid:6)
(cid:7)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:10)(cid:11)(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:14)(cid:15)(cid:16)(cid:10)(cid:17)(cid:18)(cid:19)(cid:19)(cid:13)(cid:14)(cid:20)(cid:21)(cid:10)(cid:22)(cid:10)(cid:23)(cid:24)(cid:25)(cid:24)(cid:10)(cid:26)(cid:27)(cid:22)(cid:28)(cid:29)(cid:29)(cid:30)(cid:31)(cid:10)(cid:22)(cid:22)(cid:10) (cid:13)!(cid:15)(cid:18)
(cid:7)"(cid:18)(cid:19)#(cid:5)$%&’((cid:10)#)*+*(cid:10),#(cid:0)-.(cid:10)/0)*+*10(cid:5)$%&’20314(cid:5)56
78(cid:20)(cid:13)9(cid:5)+(cid:10):;<=;=>=:(cid:10)?@AB(cid:10)C9
D(cid:18) E(cid:5)+0$(cid:5)((cid:10)9*F)G)(cid:4))*+(cid:10),(cid:0)CH.(cid:10)/9*F)G)(cid:4))*+1E(cid:5)+0$(cid:5)20314(cid:5)56
(cid:17)(cid:15) I*J$*0(cid:5)$((cid:10)K*G(cid:5)+(cid:10),#(cid:0)-.(cid:10)/$*G(cid:5)+1(cid:4)*J$*0(cid:5)$20314(cid:5)56L(cid:10)M$)3&((cid:10)9)*(cid:10),#(cid:0)-.(cid:10)/G)*1N$)3&=20314(cid:5)56
OP(cid:10)QRST
(cid:10)
UVWRXW(cid:10)XWW(cid:10)YZW(cid:10)W[R\V(cid:10)]WV^_(cid:10)‘a^[(cid:10)YZW(cid:10)RbbV\cRdY(cid:10)Y^(cid:10)UWbc^(cid:10)aWeRaf\de(cid:10)ghih(cid:10)jklmnnoph(cid:10)(cid:10)qWY(cid:10)[W(cid:10)rd^_
\‘(cid:10)s^t(cid:10)ZRuW(cid:10)Rds(cid:10)Rff\Y\^dRV(cid:10)c^dcWadXh(cid:10)(cid:10)ORuW(cid:10)R(cid:10)eaWRY(cid:10)fRsh
(cid:10)
vWXY(cid:10)aWeRafXw
(cid:10)
xWW
(cid:10)
x\RdR(cid:10)xh(cid:10)x^aXWsw(cid:10)Ua^eaR[(cid:10)gbWc\RV\XY
i‘‘\cW(cid:10)^‘(cid:10)YZW(cid:10)gtauWs^a
xWbRaY[WdY(cid:10)^‘(cid:10)vt\Vf\deX
yz{|{}y~(cid:127)(cid:128)(cid:129)(cid:130)(cid:131)y(cid:132)(cid:133)(cid:134)~(cid:135)h
(cid:10)
(cid:10)
(cid:10)
(cid:136)(cid:137)(cid:138)(cid:139)(cid:140)(cid:10)(cid:141)(cid:142)(cid:143)(cid:143)(cid:144)(cid:10)(cid:145)(cid:146)(cid:147)(cid:148)(cid:144)(cid:143)(cid:10)(cid:149)(cid:150)(cid:151)(cid:152)(cid:150)(cid:142)(cid:143)(cid:143)(cid:144)(cid:151)(cid:144)(cid:153)(cid:146)(cid:142)(cid:151)(cid:154)
(cid:155)(cid:156)(cid:157)(cid:158)(cid:140)(cid:10)(cid:159)(cid:160)¡(cid:150)(cid:144)¢£(cid:10)(cid:145)(cid:144)¢(cid:10)⁄£(cid:10)¥ƒ¥§(cid:10)¤'¥“(cid:10)«(cid:145)
‹(cid:138)(cid:140)(cid:10)(cid:141)(cid:142)(cid:160)›(cid:148)¢£(cid:10)(cid:141)¡(cid:144)(cid:143)(cid:144)(cid:10)fi(cid:141)fl(cid:176)–(cid:10)(cid:149)(cid:150)¡(cid:144)(cid:143)(cid:144)(cid:153)(cid:150)(cid:142)(cid:160)›(cid:148)¢(cid:152)(cid:150)(cid:146)(cid:153)†(cid:142)‡(cid:154)·(cid:10)(cid:181)(cid:144)¶(cid:160)(cid:144)(cid:150)(cid:142)(cid:160)£(cid:10)•(cid:144)(cid:151)(cid:142)(cid:143)(cid:10)fi(cid:141)fl(cid:176)–(cid:10)(cid:149)(cid:160)(cid:144)(cid:151)(cid:142)(cid:143)(cid:153)(cid:147)(cid:144)¶(cid:160)(cid:144)(cid:150)(cid:142)(cid:160)(cid:152)(cid:150)(cid:146)(cid:153)†(cid:142)‡(cid:154)·(cid:10)«(cid:160)¡(cid:146)(cid:148)£(cid:10)(cid:145)¡(cid:144)
fi(cid:141)fl(cid:176)–(cid:10)(cid:149)(cid:151)¡(cid:144)(cid:153)‚(cid:160)¡(cid:146)(cid:148)¥(cid:152)(cid:150)(cid:146)(cid:153)†(cid:142)‡(cid:154)
(cid:155)„”»(cid:156)…(cid:158)(cid:140)(cid:10)(cid:159)‰'(cid:10)(cid:190)†(cid:148)(cid:143)(cid:146)¢(cid:10)¿(cid:142)(cid:151)(cid:151)(cid:148)(cid:143)(cid:192)›(cid:10)`(cid:10)´(cid:153)fl(cid:153)(cid:10)¥ˆ`ƒ˜˜¯⁄(cid:10)``(cid:10)«(cid:148)‚(cid:146)(cid:142)
(cid:10)
˘˙¨(cid:201)˚¸(cid:204)˝(cid:10)˛ˇ¡›(cid:10)(cid:148)(cid:151)(cid:144)¡(cid:147)(cid:10)(cid:142)(cid:160)¡†¡(cid:143)(cid:144)(cid:192)(cid:148)(cid:150)(cid:10)—(cid:160)(cid:142)(cid:151)(cid:10)(cid:142)(cid:209)(cid:192)›¡(cid:150)(cid:148)(cid:10)(cid:142)—(cid:10)(cid:192)ˇ(cid:148)(cid:10)(cid:141)¿(cid:10)(cid:210)(cid:142)‡(cid:148)(cid:160)(cid:143)(cid:151)(cid:148)(cid:143)(cid:192)(cid:153)(cid:10)(cid:141)(cid:142)(cid:10)(cid:143)(cid:142)(cid:192)(cid:10)(cid:146)(cid:147)¡(cid:146)(cid:211)(cid:10)(cid:142)(cid:143)(cid:10)(cid:147)¡(cid:143)(cid:211)›(cid:10)(cid:142)(cid:160)(cid:10)(cid:142)‚(cid:148)(cid:143)(cid:10)(cid:144)(cid:212)(cid:144)(cid:146)ˇ(cid:151)(cid:148)(cid:143)(cid:192)›(cid:10)(cid:209)(cid:143)(cid:147)(cid:148)››(cid:10)¢(cid:142)(cid:209)
(cid:160)(cid:148)(cid:146)(cid:142)†(cid:143)¡(cid:213)(cid:148)(cid:10)(cid:192)ˇ(cid:148)(cid:10)›(cid:148)(cid:143)(cid:150)(cid:148)(cid:160)(cid:10)(cid:144)(cid:143)(cid:150)(cid:10)(cid:211)(cid:143)(cid:142)(cid:214)(cid:10)(cid:192)ˇ(cid:144)(cid:192)(cid:10)(cid:192)ˇ(cid:148)(cid:10)(cid:146)(cid:142)(cid:143)(cid:192)(cid:148)(cid:143)(cid:192)(cid:10)¡›(cid:10)›(cid:144)—(cid:148)(cid:153)(cid:10)(cid:215)—(cid:10)¢(cid:142)(cid:209)(cid:10)¶(cid:148)(cid:147)¡(cid:148)‡(cid:148)(cid:10)(cid:192)ˇ(cid:144)(cid:192)(cid:10)(cid:192)ˇ¡›(cid:10)(cid:148)(cid:151)(cid:144)¡(cid:147)(cid:10)¡›(cid:10)›(cid:209)›‚¡(cid:146)¡(cid:142)(cid:209)›£(cid:10)‚(cid:147)(cid:148)(cid:144)›(cid:148)(cid:10)—(cid:142)(cid:160)(cid:214)(cid:144)(cid:160)(cid:150)(cid:10)(cid:192)(cid:142)
(cid:216)(cid:217)(cid:218)(cid:219)(cid:217)(cid:218)(cid:220)(cid:221)(cid:222)(cid:223)(cid:224)Æ(cid:221)(cid:226)ª(cid:10)—(cid:142)(cid:160)(cid:10)(cid:144)(cid:150)(cid:150)¡(cid:228)(cid:142)(cid:143)(cid:144)(cid:147)(cid:10)(cid:144)(cid:143)(cid:144)(cid:147)¢›¡›(cid:10)¶¢(cid:10)fl¿˛fl(cid:10)´(cid:148)(cid:146)(cid:209)(cid:160)¡(cid:192)¢(cid:10)fl‚(cid:148)(cid:160)(cid:144)(cid:228)(cid:142)(cid:143)›(cid:10)¿(cid:148)(cid:143)(cid:192)(cid:148)(cid:160)(cid:10)fi´fl¿–(cid:153)
(cid:10)
O\(cid:10)xWWw(cid:10)(cid:229)R[^d(cid:10)Rdf(cid:10)Q\Rw
vWV^_(cid:10)\X(cid:10)[s(cid:10)W[R\V(cid:10)Y^(cid:10)UWbc^h(cid:10)(cid:10)UVWRXW(cid:10)VWY(cid:10)[W(cid:10)rd^_(cid:10)\‘(cid:10)s^t(cid:10)dWWf(cid:10)\Y(cid:10)\d(cid:10)Rds(cid:10)^YZWa(cid:10)‘^a[RYh(cid:10)(cid:10)g^aas(cid:10)P(cid:10)f\fd(cid:230)Y(cid:10)\dcVtfW
(cid:229)R[^d(cid:10)Rdf(cid:10)Q\R(cid:10)\d(cid:10)sWXYWafRs(cid:230)X(cid:10)W[R\Vh(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:231)ZRdrX(cid:10)l(cid:10)x^ddR
(cid:10)
(cid:136)(cid:137)(cid:138)(cid:139)(cid:140)(cid:10)(cid:141)(cid:142)(cid:143)(cid:143)(cid:144)(cid:10)(cid:145)(cid:146)(cid:147)(cid:148)(cid:144)(cid:143)
(cid:155)(cid:156)(cid:157)(cid:158)(cid:140)(cid:10)˛(cid:209)(cid:148)›(cid:150)(cid:144)¢£(cid:10)Ł(cid:209)(cid:147)¢(cid:10)ˆ˜£(cid:10)¥ƒ¥ˆ(cid:10)ˆƒ'¤ˆ(cid:10)(cid:190)(cid:145)
‹(cid:138)(cid:140)(cid:10)ØŒº(cid:236)ŒØÆŒ(cid:237)(cid:238)(cid:221)Œ(cid:239)(cid:222)(cid:238)(cid:240)(cid:238)æ(cid:226)(cid:220)(cid:224)(cid:236)(cid:226)(cid:216)Æ(cid:224)(cid:226)º
(cid:155)„”»(cid:156)…(cid:158)(cid:140)(cid:10)(cid:159)‰'(cid:10)(cid:190)†(cid:148)(cid:143)(cid:146)¢(cid:10)¿(cid:142)(cid:151)(cid:151)(cid:148)(cid:143)(cid:192)›(cid:10)`(cid:10)´(cid:153)fl(cid:153)(cid:10)¥ˆ`ƒ˜˜¯⁄
(cid:10)
(cid:145)(cid:160)(cid:153)(cid:10)(cid:190)¶(cid:148)†(cid:144)(cid:213)£(cid:10)˛ˇ(cid:144)(cid:143)(cid:211)(cid:10)¢(cid:142)(cid:209)(cid:10)—(cid:142)(cid:160)(cid:10)(cid:192)(cid:144)(cid:211)¡(cid:143)†(cid:10)(cid:151)¢(cid:10)(cid:146)(cid:144)(cid:147)(cid:147)(cid:10)(cid:192)ˇ¡›(cid:10)(cid:151)(cid:142)(cid:160)(cid:143)¡(cid:143)†(cid:153)(cid:10)(cid:10)(cid:190)(cid:212)(cid:144)(cid:146)ˇ(cid:148)(cid:150)(cid:10)(cid:144)(cid:160)(cid:148)(cid:10)(cid:192)ˇ(cid:148)(cid:10)(cid:150)(cid:142)(cid:146)(cid:209)(cid:151)(cid:148)(cid:143)(cid:192)›(cid:10)(cid:215)(cid:10)›(cid:148)(cid:143)(cid:192)(cid:10)(cid:147)(cid:144)›(cid:192)(cid:10)(cid:151)(cid:142)(cid:143)(cid:192)ˇ(cid:10)(cid:144)(cid:143)(cid:150)(cid:10)(cid:192)ˇ(cid:148)(cid:10)(cid:141)¿
›(cid:209)(cid:160)‡(cid:148)¢(cid:142)(cid:160)(cid:242)›(cid:10)(cid:142)(cid:243)(cid:146)(cid:148)(cid:10)›(cid:148)(cid:143)(cid:192)(cid:10)¡(cid:143)(cid:10)(cid:190)‚(cid:160)¡(cid:147)(cid:153)(cid:10)(cid:10)«(cid:147)(cid:148)(cid:144)›(cid:148)(cid:10)(cid:147)(cid:148)(cid:192)(cid:10)(cid:151)(cid:148)(cid:10)(cid:211)(cid:143)(cid:142)(cid:214)(cid:10)¡—(cid:10)¢(cid:142)(cid:209)(cid:10)(cid:143)(cid:148)(cid:148)(cid:150)(cid:10)(cid:144)(cid:143)¢(cid:192)ˇ¡(cid:143)†(cid:10)(cid:148)(cid:147)›(cid:148)(cid:10)(cid:144)(cid:143)(cid:150)(cid:10)(cid:215)(cid:10)(cid:147)(cid:142)(cid:142)(cid:211)(cid:10)—(cid:142)(cid:160)(cid:214)(cid:144)(cid:160)(cid:150)(cid:10)(cid:192)(cid:142)(cid:10)ˇ(cid:148)(cid:144)(cid:160)¡(cid:143)†(cid:10)—(cid:160)(cid:142)(cid:151)
›(cid:142)(cid:142)(cid:143)(cid:153)(cid:10)(cid:244)(cid:10)(cid:141)(cid:142)(cid:143)(cid:143)(cid:144)(cid:10)(cid:145)(cid:146)(cid:181)(cid:148)(cid:144)(cid:143)(cid:10)¥ƒ¥`¥⁄⁄`¤⁄⁄¥
(cid:10)

(cid:0)(cid:2)(cid:3)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:7)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:9)(cid:10)(cid:6)(cid:11)(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:14)(cid:10)(cid:9)
(cid:15)(cid:16)(cid:17)(cid:18)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:19)(cid:20)(cid:14)(cid:21)(cid:22)(cid:10)(cid:23)(cid:24)(cid:6)(cid:25)(cid:20)(cid:9)(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:26)(cid:26)(cid:24)(cid:6)(cid:26)(cid:27)(cid:26)(cid:28)(cid:6)(cid:28)(cid:29)(cid:26)(cid:30)(cid:6)(cid:31)(cid:11)
(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:6)!"#$"!%"&’(")*’+’,-./$-0%/-#
(cid:15)123(cid:16)4(cid:18)(cid:5)(cid:6)56(cid:14)(cid:9)(cid:12)(cid:23)(cid:6)7(cid:8)88(cid:14)(cid:9)9(cid:21)(cid:6):(cid:6);<=<(cid:6)(cid:26)(cid:28):(cid:27)>>?(cid:30)
(cid:6)
(cid:11)@<(cid:6)5A(cid:14)6(cid:10)B(cid:24)
C(cid:6)(cid:10)8(cid:6)D(cid:20)(cid:21)9(cid:6)@(cid:14)(cid:21)(cid:14)(cid:9)(cid:22)E(cid:9)6(cid:6)8(cid:23)(cid:6)@(cid:14)F(cid:20)(cid:14)(cid:21)9(cid:6)9G(cid:10)9(cid:6)C(cid:6)(cid:21)(cid:14)(cid:9)9(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:6)H(cid:14)(cid:14)I(cid:6)(cid:10)6(cid:8)(cid:6)@(cid:14)6(cid:10)@(cid:22)E(cid:9)6(cid:6)(cid:31)(cid:14)J(cid:12)(cid:8)(cid:21)K(cid:21)(cid:6)LE(cid:14)H(cid:6)(cid:8)M(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:6)(cid:10)JJ(cid:13)E(cid:12)(cid:10)N(cid:8)(cid:9)<(cid:6)(cid:6)C(cid:6)H(cid:8)(cid:20)(cid:13)(cid:22)
(cid:10)JJ@(cid:14)(cid:12)E(cid:10)9(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:23)(cid:6)9G(cid:8)(cid:20)6G9(cid:21)(cid:6)(cid:23)(cid:8)(cid:20)(cid:6)8E6G9(cid:6)G(cid:10)L(cid:14)<(cid:6)(cid:6)(cid:19)G(cid:10)(cid:9)I(cid:6)(cid:23)(cid:8)(cid:20)(cid:6)O(cid:6)(cid:7)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:9)(cid:10)(cid:6)(cid:11)(cid:12)P(cid:14)(cid:10)(cid:9)
(cid:6)
(cid:6)
(cid:0)(cid:2)(cid:3)(cid:4)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:7)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:9)(cid:10)(cid:6)(cid:11)(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:14)(cid:10)(cid:9)
(cid:15)(cid:16)(cid:17)(cid:18)(cid:5)(cid:6)(cid:11)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:22)(cid:10)(cid:23)(cid:24)(cid:6)(cid:25)(cid:20)(cid:9)(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:28)Q(cid:24)(cid:6)(cid:26)(cid:27)(cid:26)(cid:28)(cid:6)(cid:28)(cid:26)(cid:29)(cid:28)(cid:26)(cid:6)(cid:31)(cid:11)
(cid:3)(cid:5)(cid:6)!"#$"!%"&’(")*’+’,-./$-0%/-#
(cid:15)123(cid:16)4(cid:18)(cid:5)(cid:6)56(cid:14)(cid:9)(cid:12)(cid:23)(cid:6)7(cid:8)88(cid:14)(cid:9)9(cid:21)(cid:6):(cid:6);<=<(cid:6)(cid:26)(cid:28):(cid:27)>>?(cid:30)
(cid:6)
(cid:7)(cid:14)(cid:10)@(cid:6)(cid:19)(cid:10)8@(cid:10)9(cid:6)5A(cid:14)6(cid:10)B(cid:24)
(cid:6)
C(cid:6)(cid:10)8(cid:6)H@EN(cid:9)6(cid:6)9(cid:8)(cid:6)E(cid:9)F(cid:20)E@(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:10)A(cid:8)(cid:20)9(cid:6)(cid:23)(cid:8)(cid:20)@(cid:6)@(cid:14)LE(cid:14)H(cid:6)(cid:8)M(cid:6)(cid:8)(cid:20)@(cid:6)(cid:10)JJ(cid:13)E(cid:12)(cid:10)N(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:6)O(cid:6);<=<(cid:6)(cid:26)(cid:28):(cid:27)>>?(cid:30)(cid:6)R(cid:10)S(cid:10)(cid:12)G(cid:14)(cid:22)T(cid:24)(cid:6)HGE(cid:12)G(cid:6)H(cid:8)(cid:20)(cid:13)(cid:22)(cid:6)J(cid:10)@N(cid:10)(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:23)
(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:8)(cid:21)(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:6)H(cid:10)(cid:13)IE(cid:9)6(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:14)(cid:23)(cid:6)A(cid:14)GE(cid:9)(cid:22)(cid:6)>(cid:28)(cid:27)(cid:6)5(cid:6);9@(cid:14)(cid:14)9(cid:6)UV<(cid:6)(cid:6)(cid:19)G(cid:14)(cid:6)J(cid:8)@N(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:6)(cid:8)M(cid:6)9G(cid:14)(cid:6)H(cid:10)(cid:13)IE(cid:9)6(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:14)(cid:23)(cid:6)H(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:10)@(cid:14)(cid:6)@(cid:14)F(cid:20)(cid:14)(cid:21)N(cid:9)6(cid:6)9(cid:8)(cid:6)A(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:8)(cid:21)(cid:14)(cid:22)(cid:6)E(cid:21)
(cid:20)(cid:9)E8J@(cid:8)L(cid:14)(cid:22)(cid:24)(cid:6)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:13)(cid:23)(cid:6)W(cid:6)9(cid:8)(cid:6)X(cid:6)M(cid:14)(cid:14)9(cid:6)HE(cid:22)(cid:14)(cid:24)(cid:6)E(cid:21)(cid:6)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:13)(cid:23)(cid:6)A(cid:14)GE(cid:9)(cid:22)(cid:6)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:14)(cid:6)G(cid:8)8(cid:14)(cid:24)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:22)(cid:6)9(cid:8)(cid:8)(cid:6)(cid:9)(cid:10)@@(cid:8)H(cid:6)M(cid:8)@(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:6)L(cid:14)GE(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:14)(cid:6)9(cid:8)(cid:6)(cid:22)@EL(cid:14)(cid:6)9G@(cid:8)(cid:20)6G(cid:6)R9G(cid:14)
Y@(cid:21)9(cid:6)(cid:10)S(cid:10)(cid:12)G8(cid:14)(cid:9)9(cid:6)G(cid:10)(cid:21)(cid:6)JE(cid:12)9(cid:20)@(cid:14)(cid:21)T<(cid:6)(cid:6)(cid:19)G(cid:14)(cid:6)J@(cid:8)J(cid:8)(cid:21)(cid:14)(cid:22)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:8)(cid:21)E(cid:9)6(cid:6)HE(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:6)(cid:9)(cid:8)9(cid:6)(cid:22)E(cid:21)@(cid:20)J9(cid:6)9G(cid:14)(cid:6)J(cid:20)A(cid:13)E(cid:12)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:14)(cid:23)(cid:6)(cid:21)(cid:23)(cid:21)9(cid:14)8(cid:6)RHG(cid:14)@(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:10)@(cid:21)(cid:6)(cid:22)@EL(cid:14)T(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:22)
HE(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:6)(cid:9)(cid:8)9(cid:6)E(cid:9)9(cid:14)@M(cid:14)@(cid:14)(cid:6)HE9G(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:14)(cid:23)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:12)(cid:12)(cid:14)(cid:21)(cid:21)(cid:6)M(cid:8)@(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:23)(cid:6)(cid:8)9G(cid:14)@(cid:6)G(cid:8)8(cid:14)(cid:21)(cid:6)E(cid:9)(cid:6);F(cid:20)(cid:10)@(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:27)WXZ<(cid:6)(cid:6)(cid:6)5(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:6)G(cid:8)8(cid:14)(cid:21)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:9)(cid:14)(cid:12)9(cid:14)(cid:22)(cid:6)9(cid:8)(cid:6)9G(cid:14)(cid:6)H(cid:10)(cid:13)IE(cid:9)6(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:14)(cid:23)
(cid:21)N(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:6)G(cid:10)L(cid:14)(cid:6)E88(cid:14)(cid:22)E(cid:10)9(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:12)(cid:12)(cid:14)(cid:21)(cid:21)(cid:6)9(cid:8)(cid:6)9G(cid:14)(cid:6)H(cid:10)(cid:13)IE(cid:9)6(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:14)(cid:23)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:22)(cid:6)(cid:10)@(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:9)(cid:8)9(cid:6)A(cid:13)(cid:8)(cid:12)I(cid:14)(cid:22)(cid:24)(cid:6)9G(cid:14)@(cid:14)M(cid:8)@(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:9)(cid:8)(cid:6)[@E6G9(cid:21):(cid:8)M:H(cid:10)(cid:23)\(cid:6)(cid:10)@(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:9)(cid:14)(cid:14)(cid:22)(cid:14)(cid:22)<(cid:6)(cid:6)(cid:6)5(cid:13)(cid:13)
(cid:8)H(cid:9)(cid:14)@(cid:21)(cid:6)(cid:8)M(cid:6)9G(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:10)A(cid:20)](cid:9)6(cid:6)J@(cid:8)J(cid:14)@N(cid:14)(cid:21)(cid:6)(cid:10)6@(cid:14)(cid:14)(cid:6)HE9G(cid:6)9G(cid:14)(cid:6)J@(cid:8)J(cid:8)(cid:21)(cid:10)(cid:13)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:22)(cid:6)G(cid:10)L(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:21)E6(cid:9)(cid:14)(cid:22)(cid:6)9G(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:10)JJ(cid:13)E(cid:12)(cid:10)N(cid:8)(cid:9)<(cid:6)(cid:6)CM(cid:6)(cid:10)JJ@(cid:8)L(cid:14)(cid:22)(cid:24)(cid:6)(cid:8)(cid:20)@(cid:6)J(cid:13)(cid:10)(cid:9)
H(cid:8)(cid:20)(cid:13)(cid:22)(cid:6)A(cid:14)(cid:6)9(cid:8)(cid:6)(cid:21)J(cid:13)E9(cid:6)9G(cid:14)(cid:6)J@(cid:8)J(cid:14)@9(cid:23)(cid:6)A(cid:14)9H(cid:14)(cid:14)(cid:9)(cid:6)>(cid:27)X(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:22)(cid:6)>(cid:28)(cid:27)(cid:6)5(cid:6)(cid:21)9@(cid:14)(cid:14)9(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:22)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:8)8AE(cid:9)(cid:14)(cid:6)E9(cid:6)E(cid:9)9(cid:8)(cid:6)(cid:8)(cid:20)@(cid:6)A(cid:10)(cid:12)I(cid:6)(cid:23)(cid:10)@(cid:22)(cid:21)<(cid:6)(cid:6)^(cid:9)(cid:22)(cid:14)@(cid:6)(cid:8)(cid:20)@
J@(cid:8)J(cid:8)(cid:21)(cid:10)(cid:13)(cid:24)(cid:6)H(cid:14)(cid:6)H(cid:8)(cid:20)(cid:13)(cid:22)(cid:6)(cid:21)9(cid:10)@9(cid:6)J(cid:10)(cid:23)E(cid:9)6(cid:6)J@(cid:8)J(cid:14)@9(cid:23)(cid:6)9(cid:10)_(cid:6)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:6)9GE(cid:21)(cid:6)(cid:20)(cid:9)E8J@(cid:8)L(cid:14)(cid:22)(cid:6)J@(cid:8)J(cid:14)@9(cid:23)(cid:6)HGE(cid:12)G(cid:6)E(cid:21)(cid:6)E(cid:9)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:6)E(cid:21)(cid:8)(cid:13)(cid:10)9(cid:14)(cid:22)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:8)@(cid:9)(cid:14)@(cid:6)(cid:8)M(cid:6)9G(cid:14)
(cid:10)(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:14)(cid:23)<(cid:6)
(cid:6)
C(cid:9)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:22)(cid:22)EN(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:6)9(cid:8)(cid:6)9G(cid:14)(cid:6);(cid:20)@L(cid:14)(cid:23)(cid:8)@K(cid:21)(cid:6)(cid:8)‘(cid:12)(cid:14)(cid:24)(cid:6)H(cid:14)(cid:6)G(cid:10)L(cid:14)(cid:6)@(cid:14)(cid:12)(cid:14)EL(cid:14)(cid:22)(cid:6)(cid:10)JJ@(cid:8)L(cid:10)(cid:13)(cid:6)(cid:13)(cid:14)S(cid:14)@(cid:21)(cid:6)M@(cid:8)8(cid:6)9G(cid:14)(cid:6)aE@(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:22)(cid:6)V8(cid:14)@6(cid:14)(cid:9)(cid:12)(cid:23)(cid:6)(cid:11)(cid:14)(cid:22)E(cid:12)(cid:10)(cid:13)
;(cid:14)@LE(cid:12)(cid:14)(cid:21)(cid:6)(cid:7)(cid:14)J(cid:10)@98(cid:14)(cid:9)9(cid:24)(cid:6)(cid:8)(cid:20)@(cid:6)5U7?(cid:12)(cid:6)7(cid:8)88E(cid:21)(cid:21)E(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:14)@(cid:21)(cid:24)(cid:6)b(cid:14)@EB(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:24)(cid:6)c(cid:10)(cid:21)GE(cid:9)69(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:6)d(cid:10)(cid:21)(cid:24)(cid:6)(cid:7)7(cid:6)c(cid:10)9(cid:14)@(cid:24)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:22)(cid:6)9G(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:22)D(cid:8)E(cid:9)E(cid:9)6
(cid:9)(cid:14)E6GA(cid:8)@(cid:21)<(cid:6)
(cid:6)
(cid:19)G(cid:14)(cid:6)>(cid:27)(cid:6)(cid:22)(cid:10)(cid:23)(cid:6)@(cid:14)LE(cid:14)H(cid:6)J(cid:14)@E(cid:8)(cid:22)(cid:6)G(cid:10)(cid:21)(cid:6)(cid:14)_JE@(cid:14)(cid:22)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:22)(cid:6)H(cid:14)(cid:6)H(cid:8)(cid:20)(cid:13)(cid:22)(cid:6)(cid:10)JJ@(cid:14)(cid:12)E(cid:10)9(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:23)(cid:8)(cid:20)@(cid:6)E(cid:9)J(cid:20)9(cid:6)9(cid:8)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:13)(cid:10)@EM(cid:23)(cid:6)(cid:31)V(cid:31)7=K(cid:21)(cid:6)J(cid:8)(cid:21)EN(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:6)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:6)9G(cid:14)
J@(cid:8)J(cid:8)(cid:21)(cid:10)(cid:13)<(cid:6)(cid:6)C(cid:6)H(cid:8)(cid:20)(cid:13)(cid:22)(cid:6)A(cid:14)(cid:6)G(cid:10)JJ(cid:23)(cid:6)9(cid:8)(cid:6)H(cid:10)(cid:13)I(cid:6)9G@(cid:8)(cid:20)6G(cid:6)9G(cid:14)(cid:6)J@(cid:8)J(cid:8)(cid:21)(cid:10)(cid:13)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:22)(cid:6)(cid:22)E(cid:21)(cid:12)(cid:20)(cid:21)(cid:21)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:23)(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:12)(cid:14)@(cid:9)(cid:21)(cid:6)(cid:23)(cid:8)(cid:20)(cid:6)8E6G9(cid:6)G(cid:10)L(cid:14)<(cid:6)
(cid:6)
c(cid:14)(cid:6)G(cid:10)L(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:13)EL(cid:14)(cid:22)(cid:6)E(cid:9)(cid:6)(cid:8)(cid:20)@(cid:6)G(cid:8)8(cid:14)(cid:6)M(cid:8)@(cid:6)(cid:26)Q(cid:6)(cid:23)(cid:14)(cid:10)@(cid:21)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:22)(cid:6)H(cid:8)(cid:20)(cid:13)(cid:22)(cid:6)(cid:13)EI(cid:14)(cid:6)9(cid:8)(cid:6)9(cid:20)@(cid:9)(cid:6)9GE(cid:21)(cid:6)(cid:21)8(cid:10)(cid:13)(cid:13)(cid:6)(cid:21)(cid:13)EL(cid:14)@(cid:6)(cid:8)M(cid:6)J@(cid:8)J(cid:14)@9(cid:23)(cid:6)E(cid:9)9(cid:8)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:6)(cid:20)(cid:21)(cid:10)A(cid:13)(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:21)J(cid:10)(cid:12)(cid:14)(cid:6)9G(cid:10)9
(cid:10)(cid:13)(cid:21)(cid:8)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:22)(cid:22)(cid:21)(cid:6)9(cid:8)(cid:6)9G(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:6)J@(cid:8)J(cid:14)@9(cid:23)(cid:6)9(cid:10)_(cid:6)@(cid:14)L(cid:14)(cid:9)(cid:20)(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:21)9@(cid:14)(cid:10)8(cid:6)M(cid:8)@(cid:6)9G(cid:14)(cid:6)(cid:7)E(cid:21)9@E(cid:12)9<(cid:6)(cid:6)(cid:19)G(cid:10)(cid:9)I(cid:6)(cid:23)(cid:8)(cid:20)(cid:6)M(cid:8)@(cid:6)(cid:23)(cid:8)(cid:20)@(cid:6)(cid:12)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:21)E(cid:22)(cid:14)@(cid:10)N(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:6)(cid:10)(cid:9)(cid:22)(cid:6)C(cid:6)(cid:13)(cid:8)(cid:8)I
M(cid:8)@H(cid:10)@(cid:22)(cid:6)9(cid:8)(cid:6)G(cid:14)(cid:10)@E(cid:9)6(cid:6)M@(cid:8)8(cid:6)(cid:23)(cid:8)(cid:20)(cid:24)
(cid:6)
(cid:7)(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:9)(cid:10)(cid:6)(cid:11)(cid:12)P(cid:14)(cid:10)(cid:9)
>(cid:27)X(cid:6)5(cid:6);9@(cid:14)(cid:14)9(cid:6)UV
c(cid:10)(cid:21)GE(cid:9)69(cid:8)(cid:9)(cid:24)(cid:6)(cid:7)7(cid:6)(cid:26)(cid:27)(cid:27)(cid:27)(cid:26)
(cid:26)(cid:27)(cid:26)(cid:6)(cid:26)(cid:30)(cid:30)(cid:6)Q(cid:30)(cid:30)(cid:26)
(cid:6)

Network Engineering
OPPE MD/DC
13101 Columbia Pike, FDC 1
Floor 1
Silver Spring, MD 20904
April 30th, 2021
Mr. Joseph E. Snider
Office of the Surveyor
1100 4th Street SW.
Washington, D.C. 20024
RE: Proposed Alley Closure in Square 785 S.O 21-03369
Dear Mr. Dreist:
In reference to your letter dated March 9th, 2021 which relates to S.O. File No. 21-03369
Location: Closing of a Public Alley in Square 785
The telephone plant has been removed in this area.
Verizon Washington D.C. Inc. does not object to this Proposed Closing of a Public Alley
Very truly yours,
Kenneth Young
Engineer, Outside Plant Engineering, WSAM
GIV/Kdy
c.c. D.C.D.O.T. Underground Location Section
Area Engineer
File

May 5, 2021
Mr. Joseph Snider
D.C. Surveyor
Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs
Office of the Surveyor
1100 4th St, S.W., 3rd Floor
Washington, DC 20024
Subject: Street/Alley Opening/Closing Application S.O. 21-03369
Dear Mr. Snider:
The District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority (DC Water) is in receipt of the
application and plat(s) you forwarded to us for comments on April 29, 2021 regarding S.O. 21-
03369. DC Water does not currently operate or maintain any facilities located within the subject
area. Therefore, as long as surface drainage of the street(s) and alley(s) is accommodated, DC
Water has no objections to the proposed street/alley openings/closings requested in S.O. 21-03369.
If you have any questions, I can be reached at the contact information listed below.
Regards,
Kevin Harney
Easement and Covenant Coordinator
District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority
1100 4th Street, SW Suite #310
Washington, DC 20024
202-646-8627 Office
202-646-8628 Fax
kevin.harney@dcwater.com
DC Water - Water is Life!
Page 1 of 1

Government of the District of Columbia
Advisory Neighborhood Commission 6C
P.O. Box 77876 Washington, D.C. 20013, (202) 547-7168
June 12, 2021
Mr. Ernest Chrappah, Director
Department of Consumer and Regulatory
Affairs
1100 Fourth Street S.W., fifth floor
Washington, D.C. 20024
Re: Closure of walking alley behind 310 A Street NE, Surveyor’s File 21-03369
Dear Mr. Chrappah,
On June 9, 2021, at a duly noticed, regularly scheduled ANC 6C monthly meeting, with a
quorum of 5 out of 6 commissioners and the public present via video conference, the above-
mentioned matter came before us. The commissioners voted unanimously, 5:0:0, to support
this application.
The owners of 308 and 310 A Street NE have submitted an application to close the 7 to 8-
foot wide walking alley behind 310 A Street NE (Lot 28). This part of the alley is too narrow
for a vehicle, unimproved, and unnecessary for alley purposes. The closure will not change
alley access to the main public alley for any homeowner in Square 785.
The applicants seek to acquire the land for eventual incorporation into the private properties
of 308 and 310 A Street NE. The portion of the walking alley to the east, where trash cans
are kept, will be kept open. Per the regulations, the applicants received support from abutting
property owners, including the private LLC owners of the garage parking pads in the alley
(noted as lots 29-33 in the plat). If fully approved by other organizations and agencies,
including Pepco, Verizon, etc., the walking alley property would be divided between the
owners of 308 and 310 A Street NE and eventually incorporated into their lots as private
property on which the owners would pay property tax.
Thank you for giving great weight to the recommendations of ANC 6C.
On behalf of ANC 6C,
Karen Wirt
ANC 6C chair
Cc: Joseph Snider, Surveyor

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Office of Tax and Revenue
MEMORANDUM
To: Joseph E. Snyder
Surveyor, DC
From: Eugene Clindinin, Supervisory Appraiser
OTR/RPTA/RPAD
Date: June 14, 2024
Subject: Most probable assessed value for S.O. 21-03369 Public Alley Closing in Square
785.
Reference: S.O. 21-03360 Public Alley Closing in Square 785.
Pursuant to your request we have derived the most probable estimate of value for the above-
referenced tract of land.
The most probable estimate of value as of January 1, 2024, which represents tax year 2025 for the
alley closing in Square 785 is $20,880. The estimate is explained as follows.
 $20,880 (261 S.F. X $80.00 estimated square foot) for the alley closing.
The estimate is rounded and based on the average adjusted rate of adjacent lots 29 and 30 of
Square 785.
If you have any questions, please contact me at eugene.clindinin@dc.gov.
1101 4th Street, S.W.▪ Suite W550▪ Washington, D.C. 20024 ▪ 202.442.6760 ▪MyTax.dc.gov

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
Office of the Attorney General
ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB
Public Advocacy Division
MEMORANDUM
TO: Ramon Labrador Snider, Surveyor for the District of Columbia
Department of Building
FROM: Maximilian L.S. Tondro, Chief
Equitable Land Use Section
SUBJECT: Legal sufficiency review of a draft legislation entitled “Closing of a portion of a
public alley in Square 785, S.O. 21-03369, Act of 2025”
DATE: May 13 2025
This Office has reviewed the attached proposed legislation and found it to be legally sufficient for review
by the Mayor and submission to the Council.
On February 19, 2021, an owner of Lot 844 in Square 785 filed an application to the Office of the
Surveyor of the District of Columbia (the “Surveyor”) proposing to:
• Close a portion of a public alley in Square 785 abutting Lots 27-30 and 844.
The applicant included a statement of support signed by the owners of all lots abutting the proposed alley
closing (Lots 27-30 and 844 in Square 785) and a statement that the proposed alley closing would not
displace retail tenants as required by Section 2 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition
Procedures Act of 1982 Relocation Assistance Amendment Act of 1986, effective August 7, 1986 (D.C.
Law 6-133; D.C. Official Code § 9-202.09(b)(5)).
Pursuant to Section 202 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982,
effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-202.02), the Surveyor drew a plat
depicting the proposed alley closing, which stated that title would revert to the owner of Lots 28 & 844
in Square 785. The Surveyor created a file (S.O. 21-03369) for all documents relevant to the application
and provided notice of the alley closing proposal, to:
• Public agencies and utilities; and
• The National Capital Planning Commission (“NCPC”) on April 29, 2021; and
• Advisory Neighborhood Commission (“ANC”) 6C, in which district the proposed alley closure is
located.
Public agency responses
The District Department of Transportation (“DDOT”) submitted an April 30, 2024, letter in support of
the proposed alley closing that stated that the applicant had resolved DDOT’s initial June 5, 2021,
objections by paying to relocate the DDOT facilities.
400 6th Street NW, Suite 9100, Washington, DC 20001 (202) 727-3400

The Department of Public Works’ Solid Waste Management Administration (“SWMA”) submitted a
May 3, 2021, letter to the Surveyor recommending denial of the proposed alley closing due to the
anticipated impact on residential trash collection. However, DDOT’s June 5, 2021, report stated that the
proposed alley closing would not impact residential trash collection. The Office of the Surveyor sent a
May 1, 2025, request to Pepco to revise the letter to refer to the correct square and type of application
but Pepco has not yet responded. The applicant separately contacted SWMA to confirm that the
application should not have an impact on trash collection as it would close only a narrow portion of the
alley that is inaccessible to vehicles, but SWMA refused to change its recommendation.
The Fire and Emergency Services Department (“FEMS”) submitted a May 5, 2021, letter to the Surveyor
stating that FEMS has no objections to the proposed alley closing.
The Department of Housing and Community Development submitted a May 5, 2021, letter to the
Surveyor in support of the proposed alley closing.
The District’s Historic Preservation Office (“HPO”) submitted a May 10, 2021, letter to the Surveyor
stating that the proposed alley closure is exempt from review by the Historic Preservation Review Board
because it is not a street located in the L’Enfant Street Plan.
NCPC submitted a June 7, 2021, letter including a May 28, 2021, determination that the proposed alley
closing would not be inconsistent with the Comprehensive Plan nor adversely impact any other identified
federal interest.
ANC 6C submitted a June 12, 2021, report to the Surveyor stating that at a duly-noticed, regularly
scheduled public meeting on June 9, 2021, the ANC voted to support the proposed alley closing.
The Office of Planning (“OP”) submitted a June 25, 2021, report to the Surveyor stating that OP has no
objections to the proposed alley closing.
The Office of the Chief Financial Officer (“OFCO”) submitted a July 8, 2024, Fiscal Impact Statement
stating that there were sufficient funds to implement the proposed alley closing in the District’s FY 2024
budget and the FY 2025 through FY 2028 budget and financial plan.
Public utility responses
Verizon submitted an April 30, 2021, letter to the Surveyor stating that Verizon had removed its
telephone plant in the portion of the alley in Square 4053 proposed to be closed and therefore has no
objections to this proposal.
The District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority (“DC Water”) submitted a May 5, 2021, letter
stating that DC Water has no facilities in the portion of the alley proposed to be closed and therefore has
no objections to the proposed alley closing provided it does not prevent surface drainage.
Washington Gas submitted a May 5, 2021, letter to the Surveyor stating that Washington Gas has no
facilities in the portion of the alley proposed to be closed and therefore approves the proposed alley
closing.
Pepco submitted a July 14, 2021, report to the Surveyor stating that Pepco has no objections, but the
letter referenced a different proposal under the correct S.O file number. Instead of the proposed alley
- 2 -

closing in Square 785, the Pepco letter referred to the dedication of a new alley in Square 844 (the
incorrect square may have been a typo as it substituted the number of one of the lots). The Office of the
Surveyor sent an April 30, 2025, request to Pepco to revise the letter to refer to the correct square and
type of application but Pepco has not yet responded.
If you have any questions concerning the legal sufficiency of the legislation, please contact me at 724-
6657.
/s/ Maximilian L.S. Tondro May 13, 2025
Assistant Attorney General
cc: Adele El-Khouri, Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
Office of the Attorney General
- 3 -

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: July 8, 2024
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Closing of a Public Alley in Square 785, S.O.
21-03369, Act of 2024
REFERENCE: Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on June 27,
2024
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2024 budget and the fiscal year 2025 through fiscal year 2028
budget and financial plan.
Background
Two property owners on the 300 block of A Street, N.E. applied to the Department of Consumer and
Regulatory Affairs (now known as the Department of Buildings) to close a portion of a walking alley
behind their properties. The bill approves the closure of 261 square feet of the walking alley. The
property owners at 308 A Street, N.E.1 will control approximately 105 square feet of the closure, while
the property owners at 310 A Street, N.E.2 will control approximately 156 square feet of the closure.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2024 budget and the fiscal year 2025 through fiscal year 2028
budget and financial plan. The bill approves the closure of 261 square feet of a walking alley located
behind 308 A Street, N.E. and 310 A Street, N.E. Approximately 105 square feet of the alley will now
1 This property is known for tax assessment purposes as Square 785, Lot 844.
2 This property is known for tax assessment purposes as Square 785, Lot 28.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Closing of a Public Alley in Square 785, S.O. 21-03369, Act of 2024,” Draft bill as provided to the Office of
Revenue Analysis on June 27, 2024
become taxable as part of 308 A Street, N.E.3 Approximately 156 square feet will now become taxable
as part of 310 A Street, N.E.4 There are no costs associated with the alley closing.
The District Department of Transportation (DDOT) objected to the closure in June 2021 and
requested that the applicants relocate electrical conduit related to DDOT’s streetlight network. As of
April 2024, the applicants resolved DDOT’s concerns and DDOT no longer objects to the closure. The
Department of Public Works (DPW) also objected to the closure in 2021 due to its impact on
residential trash collection in the area. DPW’s concerns have not been resolved, but this objection
does not pose a fiscal concern.
3 The 2025 assessed value for 308 A Street, N.E., prior to the closure, is $2.8 million.
4 The 2025 assessed value for 310 A Street, N.E., prior to the closure, is $1.3 million.
Page 2 of 2